Ajmer Sharif Dargah and Pushkar Temples are also important monument attractions of the state. One should not miss to explore them on their tours and travelling in this most charming and captivating state of India. Ajmer Dargah and Pushkar Temples have capacity to attract the attention of tourists from all over the world. Both are much admired by both faiths of people – Muslims as well as Hindus. Rightly the state is described as the “Land of Monuments”.
Marion
I see that the reason I reacted the way I did to hearing about Equal Money Initially was because I had only the context/ background of what I was taught during my life-time to assess/comprehend the “validity” of something within the context of “what I understood this (being valid) to be”.
I've been meaning to make a pair of shorts for a while but I was a bit hesitant due to the fact that I'm still swelling (I hope) and I didn't really want to spend time making something that wouldn't fit in a couple of months. However, I have very little to wear, especially bottoms-wise, so I had to bite the bullet. I could have bought shorts but where's the fun in that?
When I talked my Texas next-door neighbor into watching North and South with me, she was silent through the first 30 minutes or so until we got that glimpse of Mr. Thornton in the mill, looking down on the workers at their looms. “Oh, yeah,” she said approvingly.
The bus shuddered to a stop and the umbrella slid from the windshield and what appeared in the drivers line of sight immediately sent his pulse into overdrive, for there, not more than 6 inches from the grill of his bus stood a small boy, ball in his hand and eyes the size of the moon, mouth gaping open and eyes filled with terror.
Catching as jingles you sybiled in seclusion,
It is mandatory that at least one passenger booked on the e-ticket/m-ticket carry at least one of the following eight proofs of identity (in original ) :
I don't like to "shop." I like to find the ever-so-perfect gifts or items for myself when I'm out, and I spot them, knowing they're just what I want or want to give to someone. I especially like being in the BHV and finding some delightful piece of hardware that I didn't know existed but fits what I need exactly.
In the next few weeks, I will sign up for my first official beer class. I want to learn as much as I can, as fast as I can. Homebrewing has been all the education some people have ever needed. But that's not me. I want more. I want to know it all. I'm sure that will never happen, but I can try can't I?
Very simple and straightforward.
This Valentine’s Day I want to thank you for your inspiration and continue to support you in your journey by offering FREE Health Histories. These are short, 45 minute chats where you get to talk about your life, what is important to you and where you want to go. My role is to just listen and be inspired by you. Comment below or send me an e-mail to get started! This free offer is limited to 10 people, so act soon!
"Ahhh, Moon the Mod whippet I see? How you doing man?"
You know, this one might actually turn into a post. We'll see how long until my thoughts veer to the Starbucks conveniently located only a few blocks away, and I completely lose track of what I was going on about and I end up writing about how much better Mexican cows must be treated than cows in other Starbucks locations to produce such superior milk that is then frothed and made into the loveliest latte just for me and available to me now almost at any hour of the day and/or night, and then I'll just go on about coffee vs. Starbucks coffee for several paragraphs and cap everything off with a picture of the cool Starbucks mugs the Viking bought me and...
Greta Friedman now lives in Maryland, according to the authors.
We have nonprofits in the District that specialize in services for homeless youth. But our government needs to make serious investments in helping these young people out on their own get connected to caring adults and onto a pathway out of poverty.
For adults, "cancer" has become one of the most terrifying words in our language. Most adults have some understanding of this disease, and after the initial shock of the diagnosis, can rely on knowledge, maturity and practiced emotions to deal with it...on some level at least. Children on the other hand know from a very early age that fear is involved but so often do not know why. They not only have fear of something they know is "not good," but they also have a fear of the unknown, which is indeed just as traumatic.
On our ride back home, I quietly asked why I’d have to visit him in California. His face showed guilt; he knew he’d been caught. While I was studying abroad, they’d devised a plan to move to southern California — something they’d (apparently) dreamt of doing since they were kids. “If I don’t go, I’ll end up resenting you in the long run,” he said. “Besides, it’s only for a year. I promise.”
Uhm, isn't that in the communist part of Germany? We cannot go there.
Below: I rediscovered my childhood love for Zinnia's I have always loved their crayon like colors.
A lower belt might have better technique but that is just the physical manifestation. Not that it is not important to have good technique, but Aikido teaches us how to adapt and change to circumstances. That is what Aikido is – subtle change management. So what is there at the current moment will inevitably change, and the good technique has to give way to a better technique. If not then it is useless.
The very first attack must always be upon the people, for it is with them that power truly rests, therefore one must remove one by one all supporting structure, until the body-politic, the people, have no traditional support, indeed for many all prior notions will be written off with the admonition that they are, “old fashioned”, as if institutions and behaviours that have sustained us and shaped us are now in some way detrimental, injurious, which in fact they are but to the new order, the order of chaos and culling. Once one has the people, has them unsupported, able to direct their path then one goes after all remnants of the old order, all traditions, groups and belief systems until the very world lies at their feet and all submit to one supranational power. Yet we are not quite there yet, not quite and will not be in most of our lifetimes, however, it may very well be the case that our children or their grandchildren may live to see and experience tyranny. Tyranny many be benign or malign, may be perceived as pleasure or punishment, yet in all cases the individuals and groups held in its grip reside within a prison, a country-sized gaol, or as in our own case a continental holding camp. This permits those who work for a supranational goal the ability to do a number of things, firstly to socially engineer those within its remit towards a new consciousness and secondly, it allows for the abject and relentless attack upon its enemies, also caught up in the camp to continue unabated.
I have the major pieces in place but still need to bring back out the smalls---trying to edit what I put in and plan to take some things to my shop in Greenwood. I find it hard to part with my "stuff" but stuff is stuff, right? I am even considering selling some of my hooked pieces...when they are are piled up it is hard to believe there are that many pieces!
“Bad luck to yous! I’ll sit here and that’ll be the end of the bother.”
anyway so back to being a coach. So basically I get to help people reach their fitness goals by motivating them, sharing awesome products with them, helping with accountability (which we all need sometimes) and being there to answer any questions all for free!!! If you are ready to change your life and stop starting over and finally hit your goal let me take you there! They have awesome products like I mentioned above and the best supplements like shakeology!
In the seven years ending 2009, we built about 476,842 dwellings, that is, we built 302,505 more dwellings than were needed for our new households.
To demonstrate to value of ecosystem services TapRoots will develop a portion of the courtyard of the new facility to function as an outdoor classroom. The outdoor classroom is designed to allow the students to explore the practical benefits of ecosystem services via analytic devices such as Decagon’s soil monitoring device. When the system is installed student will be able to access data points on parameters such as soil moisture, electrical conductivity, temperature and precipitation. Decagon’s software is easy to use and is unique in that it allows the user to view the data outputs anywhere in the US, Canada and Europe with an internet connection.
The previous account I skimmed through, the one that pretended to be completely factual based on a mysterious ‘found’ manuscript, made no mention of this. It really puts some things in perspective, like how she could never compete with this mistress, his 34 year old mistress (he was only 14 at the time as well). Crazy. Imagine, your first time, at 14, with your father-in-law in the room, just to make sure it all works as it should. Really crazy.
Hull Truck, Hull 2nd-3rd November
This book also presents the opportunity to talk about artic/tropical or warm/cold. We talked about things that were warm and cold. One day we drank a cup of hot chocolate, and the next day we went to get a scoop of ice-cream. If you wanted to add some ice-cream extensions, I have a couple of ice-cream activities that we did last summer available:
April 2012:
It's supposed to "feel" a little more like spring here in Virginia today. I sure hope so. I'm tired of being cold while I'm enjoying the daffodils and pansies!
Melt the butter in a small skillet over medium-high heat. Add the garlic and the remaining 1/4 teaspoon curry powder and cook until the curry powder is slightly toasted, about 1 minute. Stir the curry mixture into the soup and add the lemon juice, cilantro, and salt to taste. Serve with lemon wedges.
These days, living in southern Maine, I go to more Portland Sea Dogs games than Red Sox games. Portland is the AA affiliate of the Red Sox, so it's fun to follow the Sea Dogs, then when the players get called up to the majors I already know them.
When the BLP government had to back down, a betrayed Kerins announced that he’d paid his “consulting” fees to the tune of a couple of million dollars and the government couldn’t back out of the deal. HA! Wrong thing to say ’bout hey. Everything worked fine until Kerins said one word about “consulting fees” and then it was game over for obvious reasons.
blue rice rolls wrapped with steamed purple cabbage; steamed peeled purple potato.
But instead he announced that the next Labour government will only spend what it can afford and that we would have to 'live within our means'. He added that: "Most of the cuts implemented by the Con-Dems will not be reversed"!
This certainly took a lot of time and patience to complete. The time in my day is very limited for crafting and all the other endeavors I have going at the moment. There are some things that I probably could have done differently, but overall my hubby and I are thrilled with the result. Other than it being a very warm blanket… LOL! Guess we’ll just have to turn on the AC at night. At least till we move here in August.
Ultimately, once the film settles into its cartoonish universe of self-centered prosecutors (who somehow still manage to not neglect their families much) and vigilante terrorists with not only the desire but also the means and skill to threaten the political and judicial class of a major American city, it turns out to be fun ride, with a far-fetched mystery plot to work out as it progresses.
Are you going to see the movie tonight? This weekend? I can't believe it's all over after this :( :(
If you ask me I don’t believe there is anything better than watching your favorite teams live in person. You jam a car filled up with all your friends, grab a six-pack, some dogs and burgers and grill before. It sets the perfect tone and gets your mind off of everything in “the real world”. For that time nothing else matters but what you’re doing right then and there.
I don’t know if you know this but we American aren’t taking this message as well as I think the Singaporeans are. Because its starting to get weird and cultish around here, they can’t stop talking about grace grace grace! Grace is amazing, but so is Jesus, where did he go? Do you understand that all these grace followers do is sit around and talk about how this person is under condemnation and so is that person there worse than a bunch of gossiping teenage girls!
1. fill a pot with about 1 inch of water and heat until simmering.
As a parent, I have a choice. I can choose to focus on trying to craft a "designer child," as Chua and many other parents do. If so, then everything I do now is with an eye on the future: Punishments/Rewards, Requirements, Expectations, Manipulation, Forced Lessons. It's all just in case. It's all with the hopes that my child will be some certain way. If I do all of that stuff now I can control the future.
As my oldest gets older I'm aware of what she knows and what she doesn't know because we talk. She may not know a lot about history, but she's never had a moment where she finds it distasteful or uninteresting or even not important. Not too long ago we talked about Galileo and the Catholic church. That stuff fascinates her. Her life doesn't dwell on these things, it's peripheral to all the other things she does dwell on, but it's there like a little dot in her mind that may just connect to another little dot one day and then another and another.
Optional: Optional for preprinted greeting cards with no personal message. Form letters from firms need not be acknowledged.
I think we must look at the significance of Yahushua’s final sacrifice. This will become more clear to us in the next four chapters because in the past having read portions of this letter, it certainly deals with this subject.
OK, I'm off to finish my layout for the MFT Fan Club over at Right at Home and wrap presents. Laundry and dinner are on hold.
Nothing he can do but live with it.
1 trained
without flash (note: this is a much truer representation of what Lagoon looks like in person but in real life it's got a beautiful, subtle violet shimmer to it which makes it an electric blue--it's gorgeous.)
Grumpy, the Lump of Coal is a free pattern from Knit Picks. I saw this an knew right away that I had to make one for the little yarn stealing devil that lives in our house disguised as a cat. It took about 2 hours, with breaks to knit and felt and embroider this one! Also, you can get several out of one skein of Palette yarn which is only $1.99.
This week Michelle has challenged us to use some May Flowers as inspiration!
When all was said and done, SDCC was productive and relaxing. We sold through most of the pre-sale copies of Atrum Secretum. It felt good not being completely tore up from the trip. We even swung by Tiki Highway at Don the Beachcombers on our way back for a kustom car/tiki art show.
~ Movement forward in my development as a soul on this planet and hopefully beyond.
A link is also to be found to the left of this blog in our links list...
I'll wear that.
But the project is going very well, and so is my personal life (holding breath & feeling very grateful).
Enjoyment is as dull as dodo without excitement. Excitement comes when you feel thrilled and safe at the same time while driving at a cracking pace. Some hidden obstacles on your way may pose threat to your safety. Keep your path tracked and ensure your safety using any of GPS enabled devices.
I need to teach a basic understanding of elapsed time to my fourth-graders.
1 cup molasses
Anyway, back to the outfit ... The shirt is way too big (note the folded up cuffs), but I still felt pretty snazzy in this outfit. I even received several compliments on how I looked that day (I was having an awful day at work — one of my "deliverables" had been ripped apart, and I was feeling pretty crappy and upset. Usually my emotions show all over my face, so it was a nice surprise when people told me that I looked good.)
Bandipur National Park covers an area of approximately 900 square kilometres. Tigers are highly territorial creatures, and typically, an adult tiger has a territory that averages around 30 square kilometres. For 80 tigers, the requirement is already 2400 square kilometres. Even considering that territories overlap to some extent, that’s still far higher than the space available. So how good an idea is it to try to increase the number of tigers there?
I purchased a brand new Balenciaga bag once and adored it so much that I put it on a shelf only to be looked at and never used. It seemed silly to spend so much money on a shelf ornament, so I sold it and used that money to buy from a reputable consigner instead (with enough leftover funds for other items). Since the consigned bag already had a little wear and tear, I had no qualms about using it (though very carefully and lovingly). And of course, can't forget that you can also get a very good price on a pre-owned item.
I can’t really relate to being from Belgium or Spain, since I have never met any family members from these countries. Still I really love Spain. Both the culture and the language. I LOVE the language! I really wish I could speak Spanish fluently but unfortunately I only know some Spanish.
Software and then an additional $10 off any purchase in the store. That's a pretty cool deal. The My Memories folks have some really great scrapbooking things. And even if you don't scrapbook, the software and extras are really awesome. I don't scrapbook, but I love the software to make interesting blog post pictures. I even used it last week to make some labels for my homemade granola bars, so J wouldn't have to guess flavors. Just use STMMMS11215 to get the discounts.
Oh, Sydney.
I finally looked up at the man, who does not know of the joy of the Pod, and I said, "Honey, I don't think I can go on without one." (Keep in mind that I've spent $1400 at the Best Buy in the past FOUR DAYS.) He, to his credit, just sighed, but not in a "oh, no fucking way" kind of way.
Salted caramel is everywhere right now, and these bars featured salted caramel poured over a shortbread crust. Idea = great; execution = not-so-good. I followed the directions very closely because making candy still unnerves me. But the caramel was way too salty, and it did not set up firmly enough. I added the chocolate drizzle to offset the other problems, but the caramel still oozed and the salt was just too much. Although I wouldn't repeat the recipe in this form, I reworked it with some additional tips, and I will talk about that more in another post.
It got worse. I could smell poop in the living room. After 30 minutes of playing hunt-the-poo, I found it in a box. One of the moving boxes that was opened but not unpacked. ARG!!!
In 1959 she began a brief romance with Frank Sinatra that ended when he tried to get her to participate in a threesome. Still, she accepted his invitation to come to Las Vegas to see him at the Sands hotel, where he was filming Oceans 11 and performing at night with the Rat Pack consisting of Dean Martin, Sammy Davis jr., Joey Bishop and Peter Lawford, brother-in-law of JFK (he was married to JFK’s sister Patricia). It was there that she met JFK in February of 1960. Judith claimed not to know who he was or that he was running for President of the United States. Apparently spending three hours a day getting ready didn’t leave much time for reading newspapers of newsmagazines. Although there were other people at the table, Judith wrote that JFK spent all his time focused on her. “It was as if every nerve and muscle in his whole body was poised at attention. As I was to learn, Jack Kennedy was the world’s greatest listener.”
He's also getting waaaay too good at crawling and pulling himself up on things, I may need to put a bell on him.
For this people’s heart has become calloused;
He had hundreds of young boys learning vedas from him as well as many adults who would consult him on all matters relating to the dharma sastras.
The fifteen minutes of shame, the use once than destroy age
Preheat oven to 400°F. Cover a baking sheet with lightly greased foil. In a shallow bowl, whisk egg until well beaten. Add the chicken strips and toss to coat with egg. Add flour and toss chicken so that each piece is covered in egg and flour mixture. In another shallow dish, combine bread crumbs, coconut, salt, and pepper. Take one chicken strip and, after allowing excess egg and flour mixture to drip off, toss the chicken strip in the bread crumb mixture. Press to coat each side. Place on a plate or baking pan until you have coated all of the remaining chicken strips.
Now the specter of world hunger is looming, with sharply rising basic food prices and unnecessary food shortages sparking food riots in places like Haiti and Egypt. Officials with the U.N.’s World Food Program (WFP) are alarmed. The WFP has put out an emergency appeal for more funds, saying another 100 million humans have been thrown into the desperate hunger pits.
Broadside Blog – I’ve written about this blog before. It’s written by Caitlin Kelly, a career journalist. I mostly like this for the writing and work tips, but also for the honesty and thoughtfulness that she employs in her blog posting, and the fact that her posts often encourage others to comment back, or in my own case, to make my own submissions.
I apologize if I drifted off-topic somewhat here, but I feel that these pictures of the renewal of the Hurva synagogue symbolise everything that is Israel today, especially today of all days, Yom Hazikaron.
I hope you get the chance to play along this week!
Basically, Frey has set himself up as a book packager, which is an accepted and legitimate practice in publishing. Typically, a packager pays an author or illustrator a flat fee for their work, rather than an advance against royalties, then takes the manuscript and/or art and puts it together as a finished product, which is then submitted to publishers. For example, Gossip Girl was put together by Alloy Media, then sold to Little, Brown, and several celebrity picture books like Jerry Seinfeld’s Halloween were package deals as well.
One by one the floors are emptied. . . The uniformed
Questioning my integrity and worth -
We started by discarding unsightly plastic ware and purchased nice but inexpensive glasses, dishes and cutlery at chain retailers and at antique shops that would be within reach. They don’t always match, but that’s the charm of collecting and editing. Baskets, overhead pot racks and counter caddies are also great sentinels.
Here is a description of her book as found on the publisher's website:
Andrew Borloz I have not tried creating zines. I hope to start designing and producing them for sale this winter. I don’t make money from writing posts for my blog, but with zines, I hope I will – I have so much to share, and so many stories to tell.
Plus Mr. Handsome and I really don’t have experiences of our own to draw from here. I was only three when my little brother arrived – I don’t remember a damn thing other than I got to get my ears pierced. Mr. Handsome is the youngest child in his family so he was born into siblinghood.
I'm not sure what made me decide to try the sandwich again. Maybe it was the fact that while I enjoyed the meal I wasn't as wowed as I thought I would be. Everyone always raves about reuben sandwiches and I started to worry that maybe my first one wasn't all it was cracked up to be... even though friends had raved about it. I went with the second, affordable option that other friends had raved about and that was the reuben sandwich at Arby's. Uh, yeah... you read that right. Arby's. Let's just say our town is slightly lacking in the awesome Deli department, ok?
But you want contraception? Gay marriage? The stability of a nation that has a healthcare system, rather than a marketplace? Money for decent schools and roads? Fuggeddaboutit.
Cardio: 20 min on Step machine, mostly Level 6 + 20 min Crosstrainer, mostly intervalls between level 10 and 13.
The memes are receiving mixed reviews from students.
Onesimus knew that the apostle was an avenue of help and also that he was a friend of his master. He knew him, by reputation, that he would do him good.
Creating a diverse seed bank and swap seeds
Great to be back. I've been busy in my little nook, creating like mad. Unfortunately I've only got one to show for today though... :(
I have no idea how to call the "thing" ...lol I have to show you today; it's a sort of card in a box or with a box; well, it's something I meant to hang on the wall and it's quite lovely and bright if you could see it on my dining room wall, well that was before my 2 year old came home and started pointing at it. Generally, he takes no interest in my cards which are all over and even within his reach. Moreover, when one happens to fall from a shelf he immediately brings it to me, knowing he is not to play with. But this one he just had to examine closely and started laughing and making faces; "grandes chaussettes" he said- meaning "big socks" lol; that's what he got from it. I had to hide it eventually before starting pulling the tiny bells!
“She says I’m good.”
From here on out, though he is excited for college, he will have a checklist he must follow, he must do what professors ask, he will need permission to get "creative" with his studies. I believe however, that I have provided enough structure where needed that he can transition well.
her daughter Elizabeth Device, and her grandchildren James and Alizon Device; Anne Whittle (aka Chattox), and her daughter Anne Redferne. The others accused were Jane Bulcock and her son John Bulcock, Alice Nutter, Katherine Hewitt, Alice Gray, and Jennet Preston. The outbreaks of witchcraft in and around Pendle may demonstrate the extent to which people could make a living by posing as witches. Many of the allegations resulted from accusations that members of the Demdike and Chattox families made against each other, perhaps because they were in competition, both trying to make a living from healing, begging, and extortion.
My day was pretty boring. Besides driving Kristy all around, but that is a daily thing.
“Do you like my pancakes?” Smiling,Tara looked over her plate at Emily, her fork poised in the air as she prepared to take a bite. “Does your mommy make pancakes for you at home?”
Daring Kitchen is the home of The Daring Bakers and The Daring Cooks. The premise of both groups is to create one recipe each month, given to us by a monthly host. We all create the same exact recipe and then post about it on our personal blogs on a designated date.
All right, so it’s not a legitimate word. I made it up. But I bet you could have used it at several points in your life.
There are different types of electronic paper shredders available in the market. The variety is so overwhelming that it literally leaves the buyer confused for some time. However the really decisive factor is the budget allocated for the shredder.
Mute/Volume Control.
I would like to offer another key to ending the yelling and conflict in your home: Identify and neutralize the Triggers. What are topics that cause conflict? What behaviors seem to trigger yelling? Try paying attention to what causes you to yell, or starts you down the path towards conflict. If you tend to get busy and forget what you are trying to paying attention to, write a note that says, "What are the triggers?" and put it on your refrigerator, mirror, back door, or where ever you will see it as you go about your daily activities.
In a heavy bottom 4 qt. stock pot, add the Guy Fieri 7 Pepper Salsa, Heavy cream & cubed Crema Melt.
Bottom line: Not worth your read, though Clint is a hunky rancher.
Chest pain related to the lungs: Problems related to the lungs may also cause chest pain and usually the pain gets worse with breathing:
and we birth our fine, strong young,
In this country, more than ever, voters seem to vote for the person who promises them more free stuff. It's just way too tempting for many people, to let the 'government' do their thinking for them, to provide for them, rather than taking responsibility for their own lives. Do they realize that 'the government' is their taxpaying neighbor who is being robbed of his income?
Perks of the team:
Which leads me to my final Apt.#412 Giveaway which is also a THANK YOU for reading along for the past....15 months.
I don't have a lot of memories of angst or wooing for Valentine's Day. I remember the collection of cards in school- the bulletin board decorated with a bag for each kid to collect their cards... and I've heard stories of kids being excluded, popular kids getting the most cards, and so on. I'm thankful I don't have memories in that arena.
10. After the Gold Rush- Neil Young
O)Opportunity
His son Rehoboam did no better. In 1 Kings 12:6, he “consulted with the old men, that stood before Solomon his father while he yet lived, and said, How do ye advise that I may answer the people?” They advised wisely that he would be kind and serve his people, “and they will be thy servant forever.” But rather, he called the young men, his own age seeking their advice.
I really don’t think the “experts” in the government or the private sector have a clue as to what to do to get the economy going again. I believe this problem is spiritual in nature that has produced the bad economic fruit that we’re eating right now; which means it will take divine intervention to get us out of this hole. God wants to get reintegrated as a priority back into the financial and economic affairs of this country, and not just as an afterthought to pray to Him to get us out of this mess.
Do you find yourself giving people lots of Thank You notes? Do you have a rotation you use? What’s your favorite?
19 inches long
not as in desperate help, but just simple reaching-out-to-others-for-simple-conversations.... we live in a wonderful time and age where we've become part of a global village, where it is easy to meet new people from different countries....
As I sat on my driftwood and watched the boys fish, the traffic was unstoppable. This season is always bittersweet because we lose our wonderful valley to the tourists yet we are so happy to see them so that our businesses can flourish once again.
Program 3--8:00pm FLESH AND THE DEVIL (1926)
Click below to link up your answers!
Whole wheat flour (organic): $2.84/2 lb bag, used 5/7 = $2.03
Directed by Howard Deutch
Last year, we moved into our house on Halloween, and immediately I knew we had to paint the walls green. Very green. I also knew that I wanted them shiny to reflect the warm glow of the candles and tree lights. Four coats later, while not as lacquer shiny as I had wanted, they were very green. I intended greens upon greens using texture to define and add elegance. I usually go for all out fun, so this was quite a departure for me. I used metallic hits to break up the green, but for the most part it was layers of green in glass, china, fabrics and cut branches. I loved it.
Moroccan hummus
(Thanks again for making a post giving me St. Nicholas as a saint of advocates of children. It has meant a lot to me)
The witching hour has arrived and the Halloween treasures from the cauldron revealed: new and original artworks from the artists of EHAG. To make a purchase, please contact the artist individually. Most have included a blog or website where you can view more photos. Once a piece is sold, it will be marked as such, as quickly as possible. All pieces will remain available until they are Sold.
For many, kissing is one of few sexual acts they’ve engaged in with a wide range of people. Again, since a kiss can make or break an attraction, it is often the case that we end up kissing far more people than we bed. It’s the supreme technique of sampling the goods with little emotional or physical investment.
And of course my mom says, “Well, your dad and I aren’t into all that kind of stuff so it’s never a problem for us.”
Sue R. Meckstroth
"You call this an everything bagel?! Where are the french fries & the pizza & the pot brownie & the Taco Bell fire sauce?!"
The Hawks have reportedly collected enough documents which point to money laundering, fraud and corruption involving the league leader. The officials – who spoke on condition of anonymity – said immediately after AfriForum’s complaint, the Hawks applied for a court order, requesting it to grant them the power to obtain Malema’s bank records, his cellphone accounts and the list of companies registered with the Companies and Intellectual Property Commission, be they under his name or those of his allies.
And all this is before we get to Dude's money line, which makes as much sense as hiring a potbellied pig to roof your house:
I've been overwhelmed with college classes. I have seven classes remaining before I complete my bachelor's degree in Psychology and Human Services (Social Work). These weeks are the last two I have before I get a two week break. Then, I must plan carefully, because there is a good chance I will be traveling during Bulgaria during my online semester!
It’s not until we have kids that we truly understand our mothers — all their frets, their nagging, and their worries.
The fifth and sixth needs are not met by everyone, yet unconsciously it is something humans will try to attain as it the key to a life of fulfillment. Survival is possible and usual without fulfilling these two needs – but without them, a life may feel hollow or meaningless.
And when the media think that next week's select committee hearing is "historic", we know we have a long, long way to go. When parliamentarians start asking each other why they have failed so transparently to do their own jobs, then and only then would they be in a position to start looking at the media. So far, there is no sign whatsoever of this happening.
“I have no clue. One thing’s for sure, though. His eyes are definitely hazel, and I am not…
How did you get here?
Well, that's all the information we have for history, but it's interesting that this town has a long-standing tradition of beer brewing.
From Italy no one expects music to hear like yours. Are you alone and isolated on the Italian boot, musically?
I started by printing my digi on white cardstock for the base layer before printing all my designer papers out on 20-lb printer paper and running them back through to print my bear image over them. I layered them up one at a time starting with the bear's fur; since the paper is so thin, there's not as much dimension as using cardstock and burnishing it in the style of Mariska (LOVE!), but it still adds a little something in person. I used a black pen to add in some more spiky detail on the hedgie and colored his face, hands and feet with Copics, too. I added some Copics grays on the bear fur and his little plaid outfit in an attempt to achieve a little more dimension. Plus (of course!) I popped him them up on foam dots. I admit my addictions. LOL
1/4 tsp. cayenne pepper
No person shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, unless on a presentment or indictment of a Grand Jury, except in cases arising in the land or naval forces, or in the militia, when in actual service in time of war or public danger; nor shall any person be subject for the same offense to be twice put in jeopardy of life or limb; nor shall be compelled in any criminal case to be a witness against himself, nor be deprived of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law; nor shall private property be taken for public use without just compensation.
22. This morning my middle child was very upset at General Mills. Apparently the new box of Lucky Charms I bought yesterday had a serious defect, it had no magically delicious marshmallows. The oldest calmly explained this manufacturing error to her younger sister right as she was pouring the first bowl from the "new" box. I deduce the middle child is really not that bright and call the school board to arrange a short bus pick up.
White Rabbit by The Frontier Circus
Even so, the “personal” or accidental can open the way to more enduring matters. I have been wondering, for example, whether something more might be said about the “55” that is made so much of by the generous organizers of this event—something more, that is, than the fact that 55 minutes were all I was permitted to teach in the College of this University, ever so many years ago, before Someone in the Administration discovered what was happening and intervened to make my first class in the College (which was on the Declaration of Independence) my last.
Even when not acting as librettist, Frederick took a great interest in the plots set by Graun, who composed almost all of the new works performed in Berlin, often two per season. Moreover, Frederick often suggested the plot outlines in the first instance. He would criticise Graun’s work and have new arias composed to replace those that failed to meet with his approval. Frederick’s œuvre as librettist (in French) includes Silla (1753) and some parts of I fratelli nemici (1756) and Merope (1756, shortly before the Seven Years’ War had the opera closed), translated into Italian by the court poet, Giampietro Tagliazucchi.
Is this something you might consider trying? Which product caught your interest the most?
Farm Kid #1: …And we have blackberries and you have blueberries! We love to trade AND share!
Can't you just imagine sitting at this "oh so French"
Carrots
Jesse: Is that why you’re in a relationship with somebody who’s never around?
Can’t think clearly.
So, I end with a quote by the certified genius, Unknown. He/she has to be a genius for having such a wonderful quote...
Other publications named Forward (in different languages) associated with socialism and communism:
I came across Richard Gere in the street in the aforementioned St Albans while staying with the aforementioned Jo. Either St Albans is a magnet for gifted list-writers, or Jo is my special charm. The list itself is incredibly ordinary, but the paper upon which it appears is nothing if not extraordinary, being a fragment of a magazine feature about the Hollywood actor-stroke-hamster charmer. Never failing to make me laugh is a shot of Richard with a group of Tibetan men seemingly wearing chintzy lampshades on their heads. Verso, a caption explains that Rich is dancing with his mom, Doris, at the premiere of Yanks in 1979. The caption is in Serbian.
It’s a side of Hello! Project activities that I don’t really follow (I’m more in it for musics and photobooks), but those girls are in stage plays constantly—it seems every season there’s a new promo poster going around about how Berryz and °C-ute are traveling back in time as legendary warriors or Erina Mano is going to be Hello Kitty assisted by S/mileage. Sometimes they even cover the rehearsal footage on Hello Pro Time! And being surrounded by veteran actors as part of those stage productions, they surely pick up a few legitimate tips. So while the all-H!P drama may suffer from cheap visual effects and a terrible time slot, its cast actually brings genuine acting experience to the table.
Protest in the tiny village enjoys the regular support of Palestinians from surrounding areas, as well as that of Israeli and international activists. Demonstrations in Nabi Saleh are also unique in the level of women participation in them, and the role they hold in all their aspects, including organizing. Such participation, which often also includes the participation of children reflects the village’s commitment to a truly popular grassroots mobilization, encompassing all segments of the community.
The first background we created was a tie dye effect – the alcohol ink has a fluid movement on the Start Ups surface and the kids almost couldn’t stop layering the colors and watching them blend together! We added a chipboard butterfly from K & Company and Making Memories letter stickers to spell the word FLY because Grammy LOVES Butterflies!
Until then, I pray they do not call, you are unharmed, you can get a good rest and have peace in your heart. Know that I am praying for strength and peace for you.
Next, get yourself a decent rod and reel. Don’t spend $500 on a reel and $600 on a rod because you don’t even know how the *$&# to use it, do you? You think casting 40 feet is great and who needs to know how to mend anyway. Well I’ve got news for you, moron. You can’t even begin to THINK about learning How to Fly Fish Like a Pro without swimming upstream. Forget that high dollar stuff. As a matter of fact, what you should do is find some dude building rods that LOVES to build rods and see what he can get you for $200 or less. Sage won’t miss your money and you won’t break a rod and have to weep your little eyes out about it.
"For fuck's sake, do they think I've nothing better to do?" I explode.
I find I can be thinking positive and upbeat one week...I can write about how great I feel and what I have learned, and how I want to improve and continue on my way in this journey...And then, something triggers me, and I kind of fall back. I can see or hear something that makes me feel the complete opposite of how I was feeling.
The bisous are serious business. French parents don't just hand out the bisous willy-nilly to everyone at school. You have to earn your school bisous; you have to be part of the inner circle. Well it looks like I finally made it, people. All that saying stupid stuff to the hot people has paid off -- they finally love me.
English hits this point of perception perfectly in his epilogue–perhaps his most personal chapter. He writes, “The Savage City was like a kaleidoscope, its moods and shadings shifting with the angle of the instrument and the perspective of the participant.” A perfect analogy, for any city.
This morning, it was an archway trellis which caught my eye. Actually, it was the rambling mass of lilac branches at the top of the trellis that demanded my attention. You see, the trellis is just about the width of a typical doorway, but the lilac growth spewing from its top reaches out three feet in every direction. It seemed to me that this poor trellis was doomed to fall over in the next big wind until I looked more closely. It was then that I saw the amazingly thick trunks of two lilac bushes which flank each side of the trellis. “No wonder it can stand,” I told myself, “and no wonder the lilac blooms are so beautiful and too numerous to count. They’re getting plenty of support and plenty of nourishment from those sturdy trunks.” As I looked further, I also saw that the branches atop that trellis were tightly woven together. Not a one would be displaced by the wind because the branches held one another in place. As I pondered this, I paused a while longer to enjoy the lilacs’ fragrance.
Eventually, with my fuel consumption rather poorer than before, I got round to sorting it. Things have moved on with engine management systems, and the garage in Swanston could read it. I liked the way the man came to me in the car-park and asked how they could help.
Because I just can't stop at one project, I decided to make a mobile for my little baby. Everything she has is pretty much handed down so I thought it would be fun for her to have something that is just for her.
Don't worry I toned it down with a black hat, black gloves and black coat when I went out Christmas shopping.
Can you describe Christmas?
It's not very often I combine challenges (probably because it takes me too long to think up something for one, let alone two!) - but today I've managed to do just that! I first saw the LSC259 challenge at SCS to be inspired by something about the USA Presidents.....what the???? Being a Non-American I actually had to do some research - did you know that President Thomas Jefferson had a mockingbird called 'Dick' that lived in the White House Study?! Then the IC219 challenge popped up at SCS where we had to be inspired by Geninne's Etsy Store and what do you know - most of it is BIRDS! Bird No18 looked kinda like a mockingbird to me so I headed off to the creative corner......
Lemon 4
Anyway, as as endlessly fascinating as the previous mentioned conversational topics are, it is a narrow list, and of limited help to a burgeoning male on the edge of adulthood. Lacking any sort of proper mentoring, rite of passage, or even the likelihood a present father, today’s young men have to turn to the internet to watch instructional videos on “why it itches” or simply “how to shave.” With the abundance of extra hormones in the fast food chain, teen boys are in need of a shave a good 5 years younger than dad.
The pattern was relatively straightforward to memorise but it did take a few repeats to get it into my head. If you are going to knit this pattern, I would definitely recommend you check out the Ravelry pattern page. Although not strictly errata, there is a better explanation of the twisted stitches online. My first attempts were totally wrong so I'm glad I found the extra notes.
I read through chapter 5 of G-senjou no Maou today and it started with some extremely shitty angst from both Haru and Kyousuke but the chapter was mostly enjoyable although there were a few things that bothered me. The first thing that bothered me was Maou's motive for becoming the criminal genius that he is. I don't understand why someone like him would waste so much of his life for some frail old man with a heart condition that he just happens to share blood with. The second thing that bothered me was how Maou foolishly threw his life away like it meant nothing to him even though he could have easily gotten away in the end. The third thing that bothered me was Kyousuke's prison sentence which seemed a bit short I guess because I was under the impression that murder warranted 25+ rather than 8 years.
He slept that night. It wasn't artificial sleep, but real genuine slumber. He was definitely right where he wanted to be, and he'd never overslept in his life. But the doorbell was ringing. The sunlight burning bright. Jonah yawned, turned over to go back to sleep.
Marissa popped a pose that said, Are you kidding me?, with a hand on one hip and her head tipped sideways. Mom laughed.
Recommendations: The optimism continues; follow the targets given for March, 2010. Banking still looks comfortable.
Bill Nye the Science Guy. The only thing thing I remember from Elementary School and Middle School related to science (or anything at all really) is Bill Nye. We used to watch those videos in class like I watch marathons of Pretty Little Liars and Revenge now. Bill Nye made science cool to the point where my brother had a ‘mad scientist’ party… My mom hired this mad scientist to come to the house and help everyone make rockets out of soda bottles. It was totally normal. Now – not so much.
Will mondegreen creation dwindle when we all get our music via earbuds rather than crackly radios? Or is the listening mind just too inventive to stop making its own kind of sense, given half a chance? I'm rooting for the mondegreens; like eggcorns, they're too entertaining to be sacrificed for mere accuracy.
5) Scoop out, let cool just a little, and slice with thread. Yes - thread. While its cooking dig out a spool of whatever color you fancy, and wrap around your fingers like dental floss (maybe one could use floss too), and slice into 1 cm thick slices.
I pulled some old clay pots out that I had in storage and was thinking of planting things in these, too. My past experience with using clay pots is that the soil drys out really fast in them. Are there just certain types of things you're suppose to grow in them? What grows best in them? I'm new to all this gardening, so any advice would be great.
Everyone wanted to be a spy.
You can find Gabi at www.GabiStevens.com, www.GabiStevens.blogspot.com, or on Facebook or Twitter.
he brought you to life along with him,
Then Paul stood in the midst of Mars’ hill, and said, Ye men of Athens, I perceive that in all things ye are too superstitious.
Water- a mobile made of snowflakes, beads from crystals to pearlized navy to hang in the window. It's absolutely beautiful if I say so myself. The kids worked with me on it for the first one. But soon everyone but Rhea lost interest as it was tedious to follow the pattern we'd set out. We had painted the wooden snowflakes in white and a baby blue and along the edges I added silver for a little bling! Using my dremel I drilled teeny, tiny holes just big enough for the fishing line to fit through so there's no ugly holes. The beads were pearlized as I think it gives an extra sparkle at night like real snow does when you're out at night with a flashlight (never done it...it's a definite have to do it thing...and go by yourself at least once...you'll thank me.). They each have a crystal to bring chi energy into the room and disperse it to all. There are also 9 snowflakes. 9 is heavens number and accomplishment. 5 (the first row) is about change and resourcefulness. 3 (the second row) is family and creativity. 1(the bottom row) is new beginnings and unobstructed energy. The colors blue and white stand for knowledge and creativity. Silver supports the water cycle (knowledge) and I did the pattern in a triangle which is fire. In feng shui adding a bit of fire to water can make it steamy. Basically upping the juju factor on the knowledge, creativity and family/children. It's all kinds of goodness for the kids. But, it IS a mobile..it's not to play with 'cause it does have little beads that can choke a kid so...hang it up in the window.
I want to believe in the power of smiles, hugs,
I made ​​the highest average level
Many of you may not know that John Buscema (December 11, 1927–January 10, 2002) is my all-time favorite comic book artist. He is probably one of the most influential artists in the medium this side of Jack Kirby, and he practically invented "The Marvel Way" of comic book art. I belong to a Facebook group for his art, and they post pictures of his work on a daily basis. There have been several pics of the Punisher, and I always loved those.
But still, human nature is partially based in our sexuality.
Italian Soup
To show her appreciation, there is a huge GIVEAWAY on her blog!
We have been a bit slow in getting things ready for you. Slowly getting the room together that you will share with your big brother until we find a new home. Clearing out space for your tiny clothes. Starting to stock up on diapers. While we may be slow in these physical duties, it is no reflection on our anticipation and joy awaiting your arrival.
I’m so tired of fighting for everything. Its like everything needs to be an uphill battle. It can’t just be easy. My husband smokes. He has always smoked. I’ve never had a problem with his smoking. Back home and when we first came to China he didn’t smoke in the house. After we split up and got back together, he started smoking in the house. This didn’t really bother me too much. When we moved a third time, he said as soon as it got warm he’d smoke outside. He also tried to keep his smoking to the study. This was fine initially. The problem now is, the study is where the ironing is done – not the best place for me to be in. And, the big one, the study is going to turn into the baby’s room. So, for this reason, I’d like it to be smoke free. I’m pregnant, the least he could do is smoke outside. I spoke to him about it yesterday and the talk went fine – no argument or anything and he just agreed. Today he was still smoking in there. And then he tells me the baby is months away. I was so angry I didn’t know what to do with myself. I had good reasons for asking him to stop now but I don’t even think those matter. The fact that I asked him not to do it anymore should be reason enough. One small inconvenience in the face of everything I have to go through.
The 1980 study deals specifically with mutations that affect “segment number and polarity in Drosophilia“. I would contend that tinkering with such genes is like randomly playing with the foundations of a house that’s already been built. Especially since all the mutations involve the removing of segments. As a general rule, major changes in the body plan of animals are rare, for the reason that other things have been built on top of this and rely on it to work, otherwise they become harmful. You can’t give a cat six legs – at the very least you’ll stuff up it’s finely evolved balance. It shouldn’t be unexpected that such mutations would be largely detrimental – evolution doesn’t progress in such large stages all at once.
1/3 cup of Cracklin Oat Bran Cereal and one single coffee bean, run through the coffee mill and set aside. Really, any vegan cereal will do. I just like me some COB.
Jeff served as a lesson to me. His situation reminded me that life is always uncertain, no matter what place you are in. Twists and turns come falling from the sky at every step and it is when we least expect them that the rug is most likely going to be pulled out from underneath us. This is an age old truth. Anyone who has done any living knows that we can never be too sound in our surroundings. But still Jeff served as a reminder of this. I like reminders. They uh….. remind you.
OK… this story starts with all of the Missoni for Target hype, which I totally did not get caught up in because Target doesn’t ship to Canada. At first, I was super annoyed when people started selling things on ebay. But then, the light bulb went on, and I realized that this was one way that I could get my hands on something from the line.
BELLY: A little elephant-faced boy goes to the beach with his older horse-faced brother, has to save him, and has to leave behind his best friend.
My daughter Montana is so beautiful in every way that is possible. She is to me what an angel should be. In my minds eye anyway. She has been there since the very beginning of the new way I was to think. She came as a symbol of new life and hope. She was born at the precise time that was perfection for her.
My heart goes out to those he left behind – his wife Cassandra, and son Antonio Jr. May he rest in peace.
you like to ask, "what would X say if I..."
Police firearms instructor Dave Spaulding calls this close range situation “The Hole” . In an article I recommend to every Cop or civilian firearms carrier, Dave says:
See, I am not shy. Not shy at all. NO fear of performance or public-speaking – I know it is my turn then. But I have an underlying fear that I am bothersome when in natural everyday chit chats.
First, the complaint. Is anyone else hating the new Blogger interface as much as I am? What a cruel and unusual form of punishment this is. There I was, cruising along perfectly happy with my old familiar comfortable interface (which, I might add, took me many years of painful learning to figure out all the kinks and peculiarities) and POOF! Along comes this new crap which, besides giving me a headache from too much white space on the screen, seems hellbent on turning all my pictures sideways AND wants to force me to use Google Chrome. No, I say. Just NO! Fight the power!
oil, for frying
- Sending a query that has clearly not been proofread
Through the wall I heard the hippy cackle.
Tomorrow, I’m posting how we did the floor. Dustin and I are sitting down in the morning to go over our materials list, the cost, and the steps to make sure that I include everything to show you how these two pictures really have have the same materials in them! :)
Dark amber brown pour
So many times I just haven't felt like doing something (like work, or going out, etc.) but I knew that I had to (either because I want a job or because I know whatever it was would mean the world to someone I love). So this adopted phrase has come into play. Faking being happy or faking being energized not only makes everyone around you feel glad to have you, but a majority of the time you become what it is you are "faking".
Like I said in question two, Sazed is a very interesting character, and is one of my favorites. I hope we learn more about him as the book progresses.
Which includes these silks:
As far as socialists and communists are concerned, there are two kinds of constitutional law: “Evolving” and “settled.” “Evolving” means that it still bears some relation to the U.S. Constitution, and that they have not yet succeeded in subverting it through some sort of lie or outright crime, and imposing its antithesis on the American people. “Settled” means that the Left has committed its outrage, will brook no questioning of it, and is busy rewriting the history of Constitutional precedent, in order to hide what they have done.
Yep, not fair for the kids… :))
06 Skin
The bill will require Barack Obama, or any candidate seeking to be on the Arizona ballot, to certify eligibility for the office they are seeking. This will essentially require Barack Obama to certify his eligibility if he wants to be on the ballot this year in Arizona. This could potentially be a game-changing piece of legislation.
When life is treating us good and all is going well, we often don't feel a need for God in our lives. Our material acquisitions -- money, property, friends and family -- become our crutch. As long as we have these things in place, we feel comfortable and don't have a strong need for a spiritual practice.
Later that evening, I went in the master bathroom, and looked in the cupboard for something. I couldn't find it, because the cupboard was a hot mess. I decided to organize the items in the closet with the dollar baskets I purchased.
quite content in high school to be Barry Obama, no mention of Kenya and no
At that moment the phone rang. It was the dog’s distraught owner. “I can’t believe this! I just got home and glanced at the coffee table where I put my manger scene yesterday. There’s nothing there but an empty stable!”
The review appeared in “Leaflet A Massachusetts Horticultural Society Publication,” February 2012.
Don't forget to come see us at the FANCY FLEA in Lakeland. We're sure going to transform two tents into a Mini Robyn Story Designs& boutique
_ Conducting a workshop on some topic related to Calvert County, how to research or how to interpret what resources you find, for instance.
As I sit in the quiet this evening I am reflecting on how excellent my day has been. I am so grateful for this life and for all my friends and family. I am grateful that I have given myself these opportunities to enjoy so much.
If you do not have access to a Coven, a Grove, a Kindred, a Clan or another gathering and you feel that a community ritual would suit you best, look for the nearest Unitarian Church. Chances are they are holding a Circle tonight.
Now I also love using Katy Perry as an example, but for different reasons. She is always, and I mean always, dressed to stop traffic. And her make up is always done to perfection. I am a eye shadow fan, blue preferably, and those red lips, man, she looks smokin' hot! Not to mention her sexy legs.(Now Katy, if you read this, next time, some red varnish on those nails please.)
What’s up for the future?
It has been the subject of much study to determine how important learning the specific rules of grammar even in the primary language is. It is useful to convey these rules from the primary language to the target language in order to increase comprehension, and a majority of students agree that this makes learning language easier (Rolin-Ianziti and Varshney 259). The usual argument against is that students do not have the correct focus to use proper grammar with their primary language in the first place (Day). This brings us back to the argument that students should be more motivated.
"Where did Mom come from then?" "The stork brought her, too."
Half Full Pale Ale
2. Pour half of the caramel mixture over the bottom of 9x 13 baking pan. Set aside the other half of the caramel mixture until later (the next morning).
It's still making me cry, to be honest, and I'm not even sure why. The things that stir up the grief these days take me by surprise. Little moments that have been tucked away to make room for the larger ones that have become commonplace in my consciousness.
Why do you let us wander, O LORD, from your ways,
As one of Gibbons' contemporaries nearly wrote: Licence my roving notes and let them go / before, behind, between, above, below... But I couldn't - for good manners' sake - rove on foot during the service, thought I've done so in many other churches. So I sat still, and allowed my mind's eye to rove instead, imagining how as you walk and look the clusters of saplings in the different aisles set to partners and then pass on, the ribs like branches stretching out to join those of another tree overhead; triplets of windows dancing between bigger trunks; the arch that opens to a whole new chapel of variations; the path that leads you on, curls you round the back of the altar and brings you to the centre again, under the still, pendulum point of the crossing.
I’ll post a picture of my first attempt later – it’s funny lookin. but has potential.
But it's you and there's no other, I do believe
BTW: great service from asos, because my package was a week early PLUS free shipping!
A zombie give away.
Program: RPGMaker 2003
(No wonder I haven't had a date!)
And whimsy drove out to the west with a sigh
Some say Stallman's focus on freedom is dogmatic, other call it communist, and others utopian. I say Stallman doesn't go far enough.
Ae market dat thou wasne sober;
Al-Qaeda chief Ayman al-Zawahiri announced in a video message posted on jihadist forums last week that Shabab fighters had joined ranks with the Islamist network.
I seem to collect recipes I never have time to try, so thought I should write about them instead, so at the very least I can have them to hand when (let’s face it: if) I ever get around to it (I already have a round tuit).
Subdued and colourless are the scarce dreams,
6. King of America - Elvis Costello
Little miss patriotic... although she is quite bratty. I have to work extremely hard to get her to pose for photos for me, the process often involves bribery and if she doesn't fall for that then I resort to threats. When the threats don't work... I tickle her and try to get her to tell me the colors of whatever object I can wave above my head and then I snap photos that look like the one above! This entire process usually occurs in my front yard. I live on a busy street. I think the neighbors might think I am a little crazy :)
“Verily, Verily, I say unto you, He that believeth on me, the works that I do shall he do also; and greater works than these shall he do; because I go unto my Father. And whatsoever ye shall ask in my name, that will I do, that the Father may be glorified in the Son. If ye shall ask any thing in my name, I will do it. If ye love me, keep my commandments.” -John 14:12-15 [KJV]
Sadie would spend
Last year, Pepsi substantially abandoned its long-standing commitment to traditional advertising in favor of social media. It canceled its annual Super Bowl advertising. It diverted tens of millions of dollars from traditional advertising to create the "Pepsi Refresh Project." Pepsi Refresh was an online social media initiative in which Pepsi gave out 20 million dollars. They also spent many millions more in support of this initiative.
There is an implicit bias in these results of the active management bad, index funds good variety, but even so, the results should give every financial advisor pause. We like to think that advisors act in their clients’ best interests. But, whatever their motives, they clearly do not in far too many cases. Sadly, financial incentives tend to distort advice. Moreover, the quality of advice is necessarily constrained by the quality of advisors. Since the barriers to entry in this industry are low and the educational requirements minimal, it should not be surprising that advisors are not be as knowledgeable in finance as necessary or even as expected. The bottom line is clear: The advice given to the auditors by and large failed to deal with bias and, if anything, may have exaggerated existing biases.
Willie Hutch (Brothers Gonna Work It Out (Revenge Rework)
All I Want To Do
The New York Times and the New York Daily News, however, haven't reported on the revised deal, though they--especially the Times--has treated the previous deal as fact multiple times. Given the parent New York Times Company's business relationship with Forest City Ratner, some more skeptical coverage is in order.
oh no
Potential Problems?
A health department spokesman said that in some cases afflicted individuals are used for posters, and in other cases, such as this one, actors are used. He went on to say that, “We might stop using actors in our ads if the food industry stops using actors in theirs.” When I consider all the actors in ads in support of “corn sugar” and other disgraces to food security in this country, I have to say that he makes a valid point. However, it still doesn’t entirely justify exaggerating the truth for public health scare tactics. Perhaps in the future a disclaimer on posters that the person shown is either a true victim of disease or rather an actor would be helpful to the public. If the goal is to inform them of the consequences of diet choices and of chronic diseases, then please, don’t lie to them in the process.
From 9:00 a.m. to noon, volunteers will
Southwestern Cape: Etsy
go & do & be all of this in ministry & in my life. But as the years have passed, I know that I need
The way gaming is now is totally different then the way that it use to be. Let’s face it, gaming now is cooler and has changed drastically from the way it use to be. Gamers can now take games on the go, interact with the games themselves and literally put themselves in the game, cool right?
I mean how could Marilyn not brighten your day??
This year I decided to get a little more 3D, and we brought some fallen branches inside to make a Thankfulness Tree that felt, well, a little more tree-like. We anchored them in a large vase with pebbles, and ta-da! An indoor tree.
Jack and Owen seem to always find their way into my scrapbooking life. These two adorable guys are my nephews. Jack is almost two and a half, and Owen is nine months. Most people would not associate glitter with little boys, but I think this is a perfect mix.
Several years ago, when I had an amazingly huge kitchen in my Chicago apartment, my friend and I threw a “soup and bread” party. We both made a soup each and in addition I also made some crusty bread to go with it. Our guests would just come and bring some canapes of their choice. And since it was winter, I had to make some glögg to warm everybody up. I mean, who wouldn’t like a glass of glögg?
The driving force of this plot doesn’t come out until the final scenes of the book. Then, all the pieces of the puzzle slam into place with a bang and lots of action scenes. Honestly I was thinking things like “No Way!” and “How did I not see that coming?!” and “Boy was I wrong about that”. The concept for the book is not new, it’s a conglomeration of the Passion books and the Shiver-type books. But instead of feeling stale, or like a repeat. It’s almost as if having done these other novels first only served to confuse my guesses…I was totally expecting a different ending!
“When I lived in Philly, I – um – did a lot of drinking and partying.”
I know this is just one step to the 1,000th person to follow my blog. I know this is the just one step to the 1 million LIKEs of one of posts. Got start somewhere right? I’m ready and loving this journey and I ain’t stopping. Moving along….one step at a time….
But the things I won’t see
I will have a Facebook Freebie
I am not sure on the release date on the Devon. I forgot to ask Carla! So sorry! I suspect it will be within a couple of weeks. It will be on Jennifer's website at www.sisboom.com.
The Damned: New Rose
So you'd think this would be an easy post for me to write - and you'd be wrong. I've written this post three times - and each version sucked! I'd call it writers block if I actually had any talent for writing....maybe I should just let the music do the talking? Or in the words of the prophet Jam Bun Hovis (err, I mean Jon Bon Jovi), don't bore us, get to the chorus!
I managed to trace around one of them--it was so squirmy!--and here's the pattern for you to follow when you make your own. Just print it out, and use that amazing imagination of yours to bring it to life.
Or, did He just answer prayer in a way we weren't expecting?
This was not Lucretia Mott’s only opportunity to demonstrate her courage in the face of an angry crown. In March 1840, when she was traveling through Delaware, visiting Friends’ meetings & speaking on slavery, a mob, aroused by her abolitionism, seized her traveling companion, Daniel Neall, & applied a coat of tar & feathers to him. According to her own account, she pleaded with the mob’s leaders to take her instead of Neall, since she was the offender “if offense had been committed”. They declined saying, “You are a woman & we have nothing to say to you”; to which she replied: “I ask no courtesy at your hands on account of my sex” (Cromwell, p. 42).
So, obviously it was our pleasure to help Fentimans with a suitable response, which is what you can see here.
I was washing my hair, I had only been in for a few minutes, when I caught the shadow of a person through the textured steamy glass. I know I used the hook and eye lock when I went into the bathroom. But I also knew that sometimes people would use a wire hanger to pop the hook and get in if they had to go. I tilted my head back to rinse the shampoo when I saw a hand reach over the top of the stall. At first I felt the blast of the ice cold water that was being dumped on me. I yelped. But then on my forehead I felth the thump of the bottom of the pint glass that slipped from the hand. Then I heard and felt the crash of the glass as it shattered all over my head and face. I screamed. My eyes stung as soap found its way past my squinting lashes. I looked at the floor of the stall and saw soap and blood turn into green trickles against the blue colored tiles.
ghosts and goblins
POLS 340 - Intro to Public Administration
President McKay continues: “Motherhood consists of three principal attributes or qualities: namely, (1) the power to bear, (2) the ability to rear, (3) the gift to love. . . This ability and willingness properly to rear children, the gift to love, and eagerness, yes, longing to express it in soul development, make motherhood the noblest office or calling in the world. She who can paint a masterpiece or write a book that will influence millions deserves the admiration and the plaudits of mankind; but she who rears successfully a family of healthy, beautiful sons and daughters, whose influence will be felt through generations to come, . . . deserves the highest honor that man can give, and the choicest blessings of God.” (Gospel Ideals, pp. 453-54.)
challenge #9 is to create an inspiration board.
Into that awful place.”
- paprika
Aberdulais was popular with tin works from the 19th century and we saw a water wheel driving a turbine and how well used and control water energy. Alex enjoyed the little film about the tinplate works and also learnt that there were a lot of children working there instead of going to school.
Sometimes I like to put music on to set mood for the calm before the storm. Other times I like to have music for the storm itself. Today is feeling like one of those days.
Now take Snow White. She's different from the queen. Sure, she broke into the short mens' home, but at least she cleaned up the place. Vacuumed, mopped the floor, cleaned the crumb caked dishes--heck. If someone wanted to break into my house to clean it, I wouldn't complain. Sounds fair to me. She even bakes pies.
If you are fed up with this nuisance and the apparent disregard with which the salt importer treats our neighborhood (leaving the pile uncovered for weeks at a time and loud noise from machinery throughout the night) you can do the following:
That is just one of the reasons the Phoebe Prince story has affected me....they have been able to actually bring charges against these CHILDREN for their teenage behavior. I am both outraged by the teen's behavior, and saddened by their behavior and quite honestly hope that they all go to prison for a very long time as some kind of penance for what happened to Phoebe Prince....but if I feel that way about those teens, how can I defend my niece to those who she might be bullying as either a defense to behavior perpetrated against her or for her own sport.
In this corner of a garden
The fam and I are planning to hit up New Mexico for our next vacation. Preliminary deets and some really pretty New Mexico photos available here - New Mexico trip. If all things go as planned, we will be heading out west in August.
1 Praise the LORD
The lion at the church gate symbolizes the church community, where it is said that the Ethiopian Christians stems from the Queen of Sheba and King Solomon. King Solomon gave her a throne with two lions of Judah when she visited Jerusalem (if interested: look up 1 Kings, chapter 10, where this visit is mentioned).
This is often cynically dismissed by electors regarding politicians as, “in the end they’re all the same just in it for themselves”. This may well be true, but not crucially so, because it suggests all that is required is to find honest politicians.
Depending on which side of the deal you are on, the list will be adjusted to reflect your priorities and details.
Shut the blinds. This works in the summer months, when the sun coming through the windows can heat up your home and force the AC to work harder. It stinks being in the dark, but the trade-off is worth it.
The new Companies and Intellectual Property Commission was official launched in Midrand yesterday by the Trade and Industry Department spearheaded by Minister Rob Davies, who described the move as a milestone in the regulation of companies and business entities in South Africa according to a press release from the Government Communication and Information System, which goes on to say:
And was not too far down the lane,
This week the daikon were sold in bunches of three, so I made more than my usual amount. If you haven't purchased these radishes before, then look for firm ones around 1 1/2 - 2 inches in diameter. These are generally the tastiest, if they get too large they can become rather bitter.
Brooklyn Decker – “Wow… that’s super sad and kinda pathetic. Whatever, I’m over it. Let’s bone again, and then why don’t you get rid of that ring... And then let’s get married.”
You left with no goodbye
But reducing demand for bonds issued by state and regional authorities that build highways, bridges, airports, water and sewer systems and transportation projections would hamper the very sort of projects the legislation seeks to encourage.
New box review:
Hello Everyone!!!
A Christmas Wish ... Hallmark Channel ... 8 PM
An angel does not need a bed, but sometimes I think the bed needs an angel.
Once again, I created this sketch using My Memories Suite. I really love using this program! If you would like to own a copy of this wonderful program, be sure to copy the code off my sidebar to save $10!
Explaining the importance of translation, he rendered some of his poems and responded to the questions of the participants. Though he was a professor of Physics, at one point, he turned towards literature. However, he could not explain as to why such turning point occurred, though the reason, as he told, was reportedly “love”. While rendering his one of the “love poem”, he termed it as a “bad love poem”!
This was a weekend of celebration- Friday night we spent dancing, eating, drinking, and celebrating my work pal ML (now MM!) and her husband at their beautiful wedding.
04. Breed
5. consumed so many pastries, breaking my one pastry a week rule. I have now officially had a Serenity cupcake and an Agnes cupcake. The Serenity cupcake is more like a muffin, but their cream cheese frosting is so good. Agnes is a delicious cupcake, but I was not a fan of the icing. It was also sweeter than I would’ve liked. One of my favorite things so far is a christianshavner kage from Lagkagehuset. OMG. The cake had nuts in it and the icing was so good, and I don’t even like icing!
Well, when I make spaghetti at home I break the noodles in half before cooking them but I do twirl them after its on my plate.
Squawvine is used in alternative medicine to tone the uterine lining and prepare a woman’s body for child-birth. The herb is taken for painful menstruation and to tone the prostate. It is also said to help promote fertility and to increase the flow of mother’s milk.
But in April of 1863 Alf was passing through again, and had no choice but to give it a second chance. Apparently his experience this time was more pleasant, probably due to the fact that his musical talents were appreciated:
Let’s start with the scar that made me start thinking of this all. On my right arm mid forearm I have about a 4 inch strait scar. I got it while I was making a casserole for Kevin and me over 3 years ago. I cook a lot so I have plenty of cooking scars. However, this scar in particular always serves as a reminder of the hell that I went through when I was with him 3 years ago. You see in the three weeks before I got this scar I endured a wild rollercoaster driven by his ex. I had already pretty much stopped eating and if I did I needed to purge immediately, I was the lowest weight of my life. I didn’t know how to trust someone who had just slept with his ex. I knew I wasn’t his girlfriend, but we were in some sort of relationship. He wouldn’t have been so upset about doing it either if we weren’t in some form of a ‘relationship’. My friends were upset with me because I chose to stick it out and see if it could be repaired. I knew it would be a big problem for one of my closest friends as Kevin’s ex was her cousin by marriage. There was even an altercation where Megan and I found us face to face and she definitely wanted it to turn into a physical fight. Even after this hellish situation I was determined to make it work even though we were probably both too fractured to ever really move on. The last weekend we spent together on Saturday night after going to a wedding together I went over to his house and as I was taking the casserole out of the oven I hit the oven rack 2 days later we broke up, 3 weeks later I was in Renfrew, and 3 months later Megan was pregnant. This scar will always remind me how I didn’t assert to him how the situation made me feel and how hurt I had been when it happened. I know I have become more assertive with people now so that I don’t have to constantly internalize the pain I feel when people do things that hurt me.
“Boilerplate” Provisions
the practice of *making information widely available to the public* ….
We were totally without the sun’s gaze when Charlotte’s convoy arrived, a game-viewing vehicle heavily laden with supplies and camp labour followed by her in an equally overloaded Land-Cruiser. We squeezed our bikes on and entered the park in the pitch black calm before a silver storm. It was full moon.
One who focused mainly on Judaism, and who – as far as is known – wrote the first polemic work directed against the Jews alone, is the Jewish convert, Samaw’el al-Maghrabi (also spelled Samau’al). He was born in Baghdad in 1126 (though some traditions puts his year of birth in 1130 – I have chosen to follow Moshe Perlmann here), the son of a Jewish rabbi who moved there from Northern Africa. He was taught in mathematics and is mostly known for his works on that subject, especially his al-Bahir fi’l-Jabr, but after his conversion in 1163 he began to write his polemic work against the Jews, Ifham al-Yahûd (Silencing the Jew). That book was rewritten in a new version four years after with some additions.
those myths that had survived
Me and Mistletoe have had an interesting history... When I was 3, I chased my dog around the house, hovering Mistletoe over it's head, trying to kiss him....when I was 7, I was chased by a boy at school who was holding the green plant, trying to kiss me, and I kicked him.... The plant often appeared during my highschool years and almost ended up as a tattoo of course....what girl would not want Mistletoe creeping up her ankle?:) When I was 21ish and just beggining my art carrer, It grew in a tree just outside of my art studio window, and I climbed that tree and cut it from the tree, and sold it to make rent:)
Just look... at this babyface!
Wings of Desire (Jurgen Knieper)
A Cafe Press Gift Certificate (value $50)
The broad-leaved trees were showing little by little their first green leaves. Still a bit shy, but they were there.
Around 200 to 250 villagers were believed to have gathered to take free fuel from the tankers which had been hijacked by the insurgents, said health ministry spokesman Farid Rahid in Kabul.
Further, did you know that you can be barred from traveling to some Middle Eastern countries if you have an Israeli immigration stamp in your passport?
For over a decade, the Eating Disorders Coalition (EDC) has been active on Capitol Hill working with the federal government to help make eating disorders a federal health priority. With the highest mortality rate of any mental health disorder, we need a bill like the FREED Act to help those who suffer from eating disorders get the help they need and deserve.
2. Grate the cheese using two graters-one with a small shredding side and one with a large shredding side.
area ever.
He made me wait a year before the actual marriage.
Ben took a deep breath and stepped onto the train. Despite the weirdness surrounding the ticket purchase, everything about the train seemed normal. He checked in his pocket for his mobile. At least, wherever he ended up, he could call a cab to come and get him.
see causes in color
One last note for today. I would like to take just a little moment to remember all those innocent lives that were taken 10 years ago today! Please take a moment to remember 9/11/01
*Phreak attacks the enemy Nexus, destroying it.*
However, while I flunked Screnzy, I wasn’t entirely idle. I did work on the comic, in fact I did write a decent – if somewhat short and basic – outline in advance, which I’ve since revised and added details to. I’ve also used the last week to revise the characters, and especially the antagonists, who definitely needed a makeover (special thanks go to Kristen Lamb for opening my eyes to the importance of having not just a good, but a formidable antagonist).
for more soap, lip gloss &
when we heard her.
It's just enough to steal my heart and run
In Fall 2007 NYU announced it is pursuing an afﬁliation with Polytechnic University, located in Downtown Brooklyn. This provides new opportunities for NYU to build upon the strengths of Polytechnic and its academic presence to develop a new mixed use center in Downtown Brooklyn. There are a number of development opportunities in Downtown Brooklyn that could be considered by the University as future expansion sites.
Back then, I might have gotten suspended for a couple of days if I had been caught. Today, I’d be at Gitmo. Okay, that might be an exaggeration, but you know what I mean.
How I play it is I go for the treats that don’t taste as good ‘shop bought’. I’m talking tray brakes, fudge, tablet, loaves. NEVER buy your own goods. Why would you do that!?
Can you see that you encounter obstacles (resistance) in your life because you’re not clear about what your needs and priorities are?
My name is Sora, I was born the day the doors opened. My birthday goes unnoticed every year except by one person, my best friend Jessie. Which is fine with me. This year I turn 18, no matter what happens I know I have a job to do. Take my father’s place and lead our kind into battle for the future of all. My uncle has kept my position until now, but he will pay for his crimes.
I have so many cousins – some I’ve never met, or likely even heard of. While in the Republic of Ireland in ‘77 (it was a bad time to go to the north so the Belfast contingent came down to us), I came face to face for with Mary’s son, Harry and it was honest-to-god like looking in a mirror. I have never forgotten that.
We had less merchandise but I was again pleased with our set up and our sales. We got to chat with a lot of nice people and would love to participate again next year. The promoter also puts together this event in November while this is only for one day it is a wonderful atmosphere and a great event all around.
him: I try to give you what you need. I’m trying to spend more time with you.
the dough from step 2
These squat, aquatic birds with their sleek, debonair coats already have a secure position in our pop culture imaginations, from the classic “Mr. Popper’s Penguins” to “Happy Feet,” but we simply can’t get enough of them.
Clove prices spiral as demand outstrips supply
Author Jennifer Crusie is a master of characterization. In Agnes and the Hit Man, co-authored with Bob Mayer, readers are treated to two crazy flamingoes and a lovable hound dog. The flamingoes honk frantically ‘as if a giant duck were being turned inside out’ as they race, wings-flapping, toward the river. The dog sleeps ‘draped over her (the heroine’s) feet like a moth-eaten brown overcoat’ and ‘hoovers’ up cupcakes from the floor ‘at the speed of light’. We picture these scenes, laugh at the animals’ antics, and hate to see these characters go when the story ends.
Andrew will have his work cut out to top last night’s bizarre shenanigans.
What we put into our body is paramount to its longterm health and function. I am not saying to trash the Weight Watchers if it is working for you. Keep at it. But if you are truly wanting to get healthier (and not just skinny) then I suggest you look beyond points and dig a little deeper into what you are eating.
On Friday, AirTran Flight 15 was again hit by a laser. This time it was Capt. Douglas John Wysocki piloting the plane en route to San Juan when the laser entered the cockpit at about 3,500 feet.
He evaded capture for some time by preying on female spectators, who assumed their molester was another member of the audience. His luck ran out when I caught him sneaking behind a lady in an open-backed frock and licking her between the shoulder blades. He was wearing clown’s make-up as a disguise, but I saw through the subterfuge immediately.
Those days were so easy and free. Her studies came easily to her. The world seemed to shift and move, to rotate itself in ways meant to please her. People came into and went out of her life as if each was meant to stay just long enough to add to her happiness, to cater to her every whim, and as their attentions grew stale, they were gone and replaced with ever eager young men and women, each contorting themselves until she graced them with a smile. Ever did the world flow around her, to surround her with shining faces and happy places, elegant graces and comforts like sin. She met them with a grin, as all girls did in those wonderous days of ebbing immaturity, when the body and the mind began to flow into adulthood and the world opened up.
- cupcake 1.50 euro
09.Dk Mustard.Dk Red...1Green/1Brown.Long Arms or Legs
The Guinness book of records have confirmed that this is indeed the World’s largest burger and that it has soundly smashed the previous holder which weighed in at a positively wimpy 84kg.
With that in mind, I set to work and wrote the first, last, and only pooku ever to disgrace the face of the earth:
And for Nigeria, which has been hit by inter-religious and ethnic violence, “may the joy of Easter grant the strength needed to take up anew the building of a society which is peaceful and respectful of the religious freedom of its citizens”.
I've had a couple people ask me "Why did you stop your blog?". ..Because quite frankly, I just don't have the time like I used to! Life is getting in the way!
- 1/4 cup red onion, finely chopped. (*Make sure to do this step well or you'll end up with one spicy salad!)
I also have less than three months left to spend time with The Kid before she graduates high school and leaves for boot camp and AIT school.
One of best ways to improve your blog post is to edit it down. Your message will come across more clearly and powerfully when your writing is clear and strong. Readers are more likely to come back. They are more likely to share posts that are well-written and post them on Facebook and Twitter. You never know where it will be picked up.
Martha Stewart glitter
fog
Lately, there’s been a lot of discussion about book trailers and whether they are helpful for selling books, specifically eBooks. There’s a large variety of opinion on this subject and I decided I might as well post about my thoughts. Just a warning: my opinion is a bit complicated.
“Therefore a man shall leave his father and mother and be joined to his wife, and they shall become one flesh.” Genesis 2:24
Chairman (MS Chapter) – Institute of Classical Architecture & Art
In most stories, Alpha heroes get the woman at the end of the story. Yes, I love reading a story which has an Alpha male as the lead. And yes, it’s so much fun. Half my library is loaded with those books. I also have stories where the lead is a beta (best friend) male, and he would do anything to protect his friend. And loves his best friend to pieces.
—Dinny McMahon contributed to this article.
Danny Boyle was there, of course, and he's a charming, delightful man. Whether he'll manage to maintain that demeanour as the opening day approaches, will be interesting to see.
Powered by Linky Tools
A Wrinkle in Time (ages 9+) by Madeleine L'Engle about Meg Murry who (reluctantly) is transported through a tesseract (a fifth dimensional wrinkle in time) with her younger brother Charles Wallace and friend Calvin O'Keefe to rescue her (scientist) father from evil forces holding him captive on another planet.
Searching for photos of Bacall for this item, I stumbled across this shot which looks like it could have been taken during the filming of the 1950 melodrama Young Man With a Horn, in which Bacall played a jazz-loving ingenue.
#85...Sazzlecraft
Neither may private claimants apply for judicial confirmation of imperfect title under Proclamation No. 1064, with respect to those lands which were classified as agricultural lands. Private claimants failed to prove the first element of open, continuous, exclusive, and notorious possession of their lands in Boracay since June 12, 1945.
Another exclusive live track, this one recorded in London, of a current music press favourite. Forest Fire appeared on the band's classic debut album Rattlesnakes which hit #13 in the chart, this track put out as a single just missing the Top 40 at #41. Two more albums and a clutch of hits continued throughout the 80s until Cole pursued a solo career with varying degrees of success. To celebrate twenty years of Rattlesnakes, he teamed up again with the Commotions in 2004 for a one-off tour of the UK.
But here is the real geekiness. Awhile ago when apparently I had nothing better to do... I decided to try to decode my flock's colour genetics. I found this great article and this one, too. Together I was able to make sense of this somewhat complicated thing. So here's what I learned. There are basically 3 sets of genes that control the colour and patterns of a sheep. The first (factor B) is the base colour. All sheep come in one of two colours - black or brown. Brown is recessive. And white is not a colour, it is a pattern that is dominant over all other genes. But I'm getting ahead of myself.
Preheat the oven to 400F.
There is a special God who looks after fools and small children, and this God realized that I was running out of book funds, so now I have access to lots of free online resources as well as standard textbooks in my Guru’s house.
I added a strip of blue glitter ribbon. At the time of choosing that ribbon, I didn't realize how glittery it was...but by the time the card was complete my desk, my hands, my floor, the card were completely covered in glitter! Quite a mess...but I love glitter and I love this ribbon :)
He said he “hated this” the other day and at the time I thought he meant he and I, not realising he meant whatever was going on in his world at that time.
2063.E-IX/23/1998. “Revelations May Cause Politicians to Think Before Judging.” Hickory Daily Record, Hickory, North Carolina, p. A-4.
and machine grime of the day.
Instead, what they do is make use of 'temperature anomalies.' These compare the average temperature for the required year against long term averages using the same weather stations. That way you get a like-for-like comparison and can understand the way temperature is changing without knowing the 'real' average temperature across the world.
I am the door: by me if any man enter in, he shall be saved. Jn. 10:9
Please note if you ARE German, this is all in good fun. It's just comedy. I laugh at English stereotypes.
No one's got a cross to bear
I'll just have to wait and see.
Now that may be hypocritical but pretty moderate compared to a lot of people this weekend.
I think that being a dad is probably the one thing that I’m best at and I was meant to be. I can’t imagine a life without ever experiencing that.
You: So, what have you been up to then?
Over the past few days, I have had two interesting conversations - one with each son - that have tugged on my heart strings in vastly different, yet eerily congruent, ways.
I used to loooove this anime
Day 2: We made a mistake of combining our Sumaguing Cave connection and Big Falls in one day. It was really really tiring and my legs had been sore all week. Nonetheless, it was super fun and fulfilling. The extraordinary experience and the magical aura of the place made it memorable.
When you’re accepting offers from prospective buyers, you should always try to work with them. While you may feel it’s worth a specific price, you won’t always get that amount exactly. Speak with a professional real estate agent to find out what they believe your home is worth in order to guarantee you don’t try to over or under sell.
The tutorial on the Expressions Vinyl site was really clear and I had no problems whatsoever. Honestly, the most difficult part was figuring out what to say on each shirt.
People posting a session are responsible for initiating the discussion and for reporting back later. Participants sign up for different sessions and within a given time-frame people can attend one only, or go from session to session, or do nothing at all. The basic principles are that whatever happens is the only thing that could have happened, and that the people who turn up for a given session are the right people. As Owen (1998) puts it :”If any situation is not learning rich, it is incumbent upon the individual participant to make it so.”
‘I can’t do this,’ Felicity said. She knew there were intelligent reasons to object to his plan, but in that moment, with his presence, his smell, his feel so close to her, it was all she could manage.
The designer paper on top of the Fleur de Lis dis is 4" x 3"
In October 2011, a lawsuit against Sotheby's and Christie's commenced in Los Angeles (reported in Art and Artifice here). The claimants - a class of artists including Chuck Close, Laddie John Dill and the estate of Robert Graham (and, in Christie's case, the Sam Francis Foundation) - are arguing that the auction houses unlawfully failed to collect the 5% artist's resale royalty that California law demands. The state's Resale Royalty Act (CRRA) says that:
It grows in a wreath
Tonight in my PR2 class we started an assignment involving twitter. First, we had to pick a company or product follow them and see what others say about the product.
It cannot be denied that the fight choreography in Gareth Evans' The Raid: Redemption ranks among the finest ever put to film. A showcase for the Indonesian martial art of Pencak Silat, The Raid plays a attention-deficit version of Die Hard, replicating that film's sense of economic progression through the floors of an enemy-controlled building but cutting out even the slightest pauses. In theory, it's the perfect film, not wasting any time on plot or even characterization before moving into a police raid on an apartment complex serving as a haven for Jakarta's criminals. The film barely even makes time to establish why an elite squad is about to kick in the doors of this building, and it says even less when they start kicking in heads.
It marks the death of spring and the beginning of summer.
Dust a clean surface with flour. Roll out the dough to 1/8 inch thick. Using a cookie cutter (3” or 5” depending how big you want the panzarotti), cut circles out of the dough. Take the leftover dough and roll it out again to make more circles.
Here is the link for what I bought before. 7 beans, but the price is now $7.76. That is still a good price.
I was fortunate to have met him.
To colour this image I used my pencils and my Zest it! oil and blending stumps.
Elektric Music - Kissing The Machine
he looks at me with eyes that shine
While it breaks,
Ingredients needed : tomatoes, eggs, chopped garlic, chopped spring onion, cooking oil, some Chinese cooking wine, cornflour (cornstarch), salt and water. Tomato paste is optional if tomatoes are not too flavourful or red.
- In Maryland, USA, it is still illegal for radio stations to play Randy Newman's song 'Short people'.
sa.nLength = sizeof(SECURITY_ATTRIBUTES);
I am only 3/4 of the way through the book. Although I have not reached his final conclusions, I have found that Kevin has presented Liberty in a fair and even-keeled manner. I was constantly struck that he was capable of graciously depicting his fellow students, students that would have driven me into a semi-rage on account of their unchristlike attitudes and hatefulness.
*Delicious Deal!
db
the secret is all that you're worth
I am well aware Thanksgiving Day might be the absolute worst time to post a restaurant review coupled with pictures. However, the way I look at it I'm doing you all a favor by posting this today. Hopefully, the over eating you've done today will allow you to avoid the need to run out to your nearest burger joint and demand a large fries, double patty burger, and homemade milk shake. Be warned though, you may just crave a burger after this post; I can't be blamed.
~LAEvanesce
I'm bitching.
1. Make sure your physical therapist, nurse, psychologist or doctor
The slave masters decide who gets a place to sell in the market, shopping malls and all the major markets in the continent. The slave masters decide who should own a business and who should have a share in that business. They decide who should get a contract and whose certificate as contractor should be withdrawn. Contractors do substandard works, collect hundreds of millions of dollars, give politicians their share and that is all. So a road whose live span is twenty years has to be resurfaced after just two years. For the past fifteen years Accra-Kumasi road in Ghana has been resurfaced more than five times after paying contractors hundreds of millions of dollars. This explains why school buildings collapse and children are killed. It also explains why communities are flooded anytime it rains as poor quality drainage networks are built. Projects costs and costs of major public procurement contracts are inflated three or four times normal cost by the Slave Masters and the poor people are made to pay for it.
Rothschild was not a technician...He could not create the weaponry for Israel. But he could inform its Intelligence leaders (with whom he was very close as an important, secret member of Mossad) which scientists might be helpful, where the available technology might be and how it might be obtained and funded.
And boy oh boy... this is going to bring you all a lot more stories and content. Like where are Bryan and I living now that we lost our master bedroom? Where do we store our office supplies and print our spreadsheets? And what is going on with the boys bedroom switcharoo? That my friends will be shared soon, so stay tuned!
Chris Clement: Nope. Archetypes are exactly the way to describe my statement. Considering my (almost complete) degree is in Psychology, my love of debate, philosophy and theology, it would be foolish to think that these things would not have some (significant) influence upon my spirituality and my perception of deity.
eating toast and peanut butter with their dogs.
It is SO SO easy! I promise. All you do is send me your email and phone number, and your address and I will set up an eshow for you. Then, you get a special link to post on your facebook page or blog or email for your friends and family to shop at.
yay! I had a finish this week!
Back in February Rebekah from Just For Dasisy and myself announced that we were planning our first Australian Busy Bag Swap. Fast forward two months and here we are enjoying our fabulous busy bags! I have already made good use of ours on a long car trip, in a doctor's waiting room and just to keep Miss 2 busy while I tend to her brother.
93. “Wealth is the ability to fully experience life.” – Henry David Thoreau
The car, though, was a surprise. The driver’s father, Bo Xilai, was in the midst of a controversial campaign to revive the spirit of Mao Zedong through mass renditions of old revolutionary anthems, known as “red singing.” He had ordered students and officials to work stints on farms to reconnect with the countryside. His son, meanwhile, was driving a car worth hundreds of thousands of dollars and as red as the Chinese flag, in a country where the average household income last year was about $3,300.
Today, I’m getting ready for my sister’s visit and will pick her up from the airport tonight. We will do our usual which is to shop and talk till we drop. Oh yeah….Had a nice Easter….sang at three church services and went on a bike ride at the lakes in the afternoon. Hope your Easter was meaningful and great!
The HMIC report was dramatically pulled at the last minute after (yet more) revelations that Kennedy was by no means a rogue officer. In the late 1990s undercover cop Jim Boyling was prosecuted under his false identity and perjured himself in the process. As a supposed defendant, this officer was in meetings where activists met with their lawyers to discuss their case.
was switching to the Democrats, but the loss of Koo as a potential Senate candidate will loom large. Koo left in part because he was tired of the Queens Republicans’ longstanding internal strife. There may be a bright spot for the party, though, if Skelos can cut a favorable
The narrative refers to Pharaoh’s orders to the two Hebrew midwives to kill any Hebrew baby boy they deliver. Because of their refusal to obey the royal order, among other things, the baby Moses was saved only to grow up and confront Pharaoh to “let my people go.”
Starring: Meat Loaf, Dana Patrick, Brett Cullen, and Xander Berkley
And so I did, the model/designer was just as humble to meet me as I was to meet her, when I spent an hour or so sipping mint tea in her little studio. I placed two orders, one of them is being made in pic one, because if you have an opportunity to own a human hair tote - you really should.
I enter by the timber porch which still features its original 14th century crossed oak beams and carved bosses. The ogee arched frames of the narrow porch windows are still visible, but most now infilled, or replaced with more recent glazing. Once inside, although deserted today, there’s a feeling that the building is well-loved and vibrant. It’s well decorated and with new oak furniture including a glass-windowed organ case behind which cuddly toys sit on the keyboard; despite its relative isolation, this is a church that is still very much at the heart of its parish.
If yesterday the orders came from Damascus, where the Arab League headquartered the boycott operations, today the boycott virus is spreading through Dutch pension funds, Scandinavian universities, UK labor unions, Italian food co-ops, German industrial companies, US churches and Belgian cultural institutions.
We eventually were given a medicine called Pentasa and he has 1500mg everyday. So we have a new saying, 1500 Pentasa a day keeps the doctor away. Life was good for a two-year period.
However, in December of 1981, Rawlings, unsatisified with the progress being made, overthrew the government again. Like Nassar, he ran for president (Rawlings would finally retire from the military in 1992). He won, with 58% of the vote. He would serve as President until 2001. He was prevented by the Ghanian Constitution from running again.
(It appears that Jamie Lee Curtis also wrote about the "Nothing to undo" message on iPhones this week. Random! Read her thoughts at Huffington Post).
FH: That I had continued with my education - I always made sure that my two girls knew how important it is to be equipped for life, to be able to stand on their own two feet. It is always necessary for a woman to have the means to earn a living.
As home his footsteps he hath turned
21st April – around 1.45 pm I received a call from my 4th SIL saying that he’s in CGH A&E, not breathing. The doctors were trying their best to revive him.
conflicted during the writing of the novel as to whether sense or sensibility should triumph – and what
And I think that is something that is really beautiful about Kehilar Hadar. People sometimes criticize it as being an “Upper West Side” phenomenon. Umm, yeah. Of course we’re an Upper West Side phenomenon! We live here, or around here, and we have this beautiful spiritual community that really reflects the texture of our physical community. Staring out those windows—look at those Upper West Side types walking down the street!
Darton East
Wake up and stop blaming
Slowly I grew to a 30" waist and I weighed about 132 pounds. That was a weight that I stayed at for nearly a decade till I grew to a 32" waist and weighed in at about 158 pounds. I stayed that weight give or take 5 to 7 pounds till January when I quit smoking and have finally realized that no my pants have not shrunk I have grown. I now am pushing 178 pounds into 32" waist jeans and pretending that my hips are supposed to feel pained all day long till I can get home and rip them off faster than a hooker with a new john.
That’s when she met Boston, her alleged trafficker, and crack cocaine.
- Park ranger who captured a gun-slinging pervert in Prospect Park is reprimanded by the city for the deed. Brooklyn Paper
We received information from our agency that the adoption finalization will take place either April 2nd or April 9th. We are super excited for that! We just finished our 4th post placement visit with our social worker this week. All went well.
Council engineers and a surveyor were inspecting the Palace Hotel, formerly known as the Aurora Tavern, after a member of the public noticed the cracks about 4pm. The building opposite the Sky Tower had been bought to be converted into a brothel.
And I failed.
So you could find your proper place among them.
The Big Bang was the big payoff. The final episode of the series, it had a lot to live up to after the brain smashing cliffhanger that preceded it. It ranks at number four only because it fell short of our admittedly unrealistically high expectations. Everything tied up a bit too neatly at the end, leaving us a bit confused but satisfied. While the ending was mildly disappointing, everything leading up to it was awesome. We got the treat of multiple Doctors hopping through time in both a top hat and fez, and a nod to Richard Dawkins. Rory was brilliant in this episode, and I can’t wait to see how both he and Amy do as the Doctor’s two companions next season. (Yay! Boy companion!)
I am still debating on calling this project "complete". I think the drawer and doors are asking for some decorative molding. Or paint. But until that day comes, we are in love with what we have done so far! So so very in love.
Last Thursday my lovely friend Sally came round and helped me do a trial set up on my dining room table. It was reassuring to see the fluff filling the table, and to know that there was even more still in bags ready to put out. I have dyed up 3 or 4 of the same in one dye lot as I felt it would be good for spinners if they wanted to spin to knit something bigger than a scarf.
Yup, at one point in my life I wasn't consumed with homework, family, life, work, sickness and chores.
Eventually there will be dance performances for mysterious (apparently mostly male) audiences, travels through tunnels, and a train ride. At its most basic level, the film is about cycles of life and learning, growth and maturity, innocence and experience -- the sharp desires both for knowledge and freedom and for a return to blissful ignorance.
The University of Texas at Austin, Texas Tech, the University of Houston and Texas Southern University have projects or clinics that examine questionable convictions. Similar projects are in operation across the country.
Are Elections Canada, and those defending the lack of charges, being too clever by half in their interpretation of the law?
In the email to PM Lee, Mr De Costa also expressed his disappointment at the lack of proper ‘contingency plans’ to handle such emergencies.
I know this layout needs a little something extra so I'll be working on that.
And as he had willed, in a golden grave he lay,
Later that night, Emmy Lou is getting undressed, knowing deep inside that Jonah Hex is alive. There is a knock on the door. It's the hotel manager with a message. When Emmy opens the door she is confronted by two goons and Quentin Turnbull (okay, make that three goons, or two goons and a heartless bastard) who is demanding the letter (of which Emmy knows nothing of) that Jonah had entrusted to her!
Now this..
(Paramount) Sacha Baron Cohen, Anna Faris, Ben Kingsley, Megan Fox. The brutal dictator of an Arab republic, known to encourage terrorism, is called to address the United Nations and answer for his crimes against his people. However on his way there, his prodigious beard is shaved, rendering him unrecognizable. Will he be able to fight his way back to the UN, make his address and resume abusing his country? (Opens today)
I will need to come up with things to say that replace the negative, so that's something I will be working on. I need some mantras, and not something like, "a lot of guys like big derrieres" but instead something like, "my toes are freaking awesome."
I hope by talking about it that I will help others to drop their barriers a bit, though much of the time I want to be treated as normal. I am Maggie, the same person as I have always been ..... I experience the same things as you and face the same fears as you.
This card is going to my daughter-in-law for her birthday. We share the same day (although she's much much younger.....LOL). And since I'm a twin I also share it with my twin brother. LOL
The forecast calls for miracles. I’m expectant.
What can a man build with his hands?
I’ve decided I’m going to stop shaving and have permanent stubble type thing going on…less time wasted on it, and obviously better for the skin too…kinda like this..I apologise for the trauma you are about to face
“There is no one holy like the LORD; there is no one besides you; there is no Rock like our God… The LORD brings death and makes alive; he brings down to the grave and raises up.” 1 Samuel 2:2, 6
I love what I do…I shop almost everyday for new stuff and new ways to use my current inventory. It’s possible that “vintage” weddings will slow down, but vintage will never die, it will evolve. My pieces are great for birthdays, engagements, showers, photo sessions, or just a Girl’s night in. I love to help pull together the right"vintage vision" style to make any event all the more special with those one of a kind touches!
Winner – “This can be the worst article of all, I’ve study” – Why you little, ggggrrrrrrrrrr, oh hold on a minute…
Samuel
Good Day by The Chocolate Society
I used My Minds Eye papers, Dovecraft cream cardstock, Cream lace, gorgeous roses and leaves from my stash and some Card Candy. Lastly I added a dome greeting with Happy birthday in gold.
Was hoary on the hill.
12. BOTTOMLESS BELLY BUTTON/MOME SHORT STORIES
Cheers, Mr M, and massive good luck!
Anchor your look with a rich palette of neutrals from tobacco and rust to toffee and cinnamon.
Seemingly, according to the Prof, a "high percentage" of students consider drinking "immoral".
Go inside your house and bust out your wife
King Arthur is obviously less historical than Alexander the Great, even when authors try to stick to the facts, so I thought it would be fun to create a History Girls scale of 0-5 (where 0 is pure fantasy and 5 is historical fact) and try to grade some well-known elements of Arthurian legend. Do let me know if you disagree!
Shortly after hearing their first album Idlewild announced a tour and who should be supporting? The Twilight Sad. I was extremely excited. The first tour date I was going to was Inverness so after I'd finished a horrible day of uni (no wonder I dropped out) I rushed up the A9, well, as much as you can rush on the A9...
The insurance company, which had constructed the building as its headquarters in 1911, was originally named the Germania Life Insurance Company, after the nationality of its immigrant founders. Anti-German sentiment during World War I led to the name change; the urban myth is that the name was changed to Guardian to allow reuse of as many of the letter from the old sign as was possible.
Erin Daddea: Everything is great. There is really nothing bad about Dual XR4115 In .
Today we have an interesting read from Jean Munro of Ceardannan Jewellery, including words about her inspiration, her start in jewellery-making, and a great double-quotation that sums up her approach to life!
1/2 cup fresh lemon juice
Don’t let yourself be distracted by the hairdo and the clothes. It was called fashion back then.
Regardless of who your sponsor is or who is impacted by you cancelling its unfortunately you who is at the greatest disadvantage by cancelling your GDI account and its ultimately you who is responsible for the success or cancellation of your GDI business. Think carefully and consider what you gain as well as what you lose by cancelling your GDI account and make whatever decision is best for you.
Not more than once a minute.
By twenty one, my husband and I welcomed our first child. Motherhood is by far the most rewarding and the most difficult thing that I have ever experienced.
Returning to his seat, Self invites Russ to open the “little bag” he has with him, and Russ opens his rucksack and brings out his Punch puppet, as made by Bob Wade. Russ summarises Punch’s notorious dark character and murderous acts: “Percy Press once said to me ‘Punch is so old he can’t die,’” and then, with a slip of the tongue into Riddleyspeak, “‘he’s a law unto hisself.’ ... There’s something in him that doesn’t care about him, that he is simply the vehicle for. And I always remember the ‘broken seagull’ – do you want to read that bit?” The two try to find the passage in question but can’t locate it; a Google search brings up the reference on the Riddley Walker Annotations website: “they myndit me of gulls eyes. Eyes so fearce they cudnt even be sorry for the naminal they wer in”. Russ summarises the passage and Self comments that it echoes what Lorna says early on in the book about “something looking out through our eye-hoals”: Riddley’s people have a sense of an elemental force that is refracted back to them through the Punch story. Russ: “Riddley looks back in time to us as the people who made the 1Big1 – this thing is in us, but it didn’t care for us.”
The problem is that I actually don’t have time today. I’ve got new syllabi to write, two work meetings, a speech to write for my best friend’s wedding, a yoga class, and I haven’t even unpacked from my weekend getaway.
callous on the side of my thumb already!
I have also met some of the people with whom your sister is working, including two mothers who lost their daughters to adoption, one in a so called “open adoption.” I guess the fact that you lost your son to adoption puts you in the same category as these women. OH! THAT’S RIGHT! You still had him with you, didn’t you? I guess that REMOVES you from that category.
Okay… so the Third Eye is a psychic ability connected to the occult. Dictionary.com defines occult as knowledge of secret or supernatural powers, beyond the the range of ordinary senses, or secret/hidden information only available to the initiated.
Every year on New Year's Eve, Tracy and I celebrate the coming year with champagne cocktails and a movie marathon. The wisdom of this decision has become clear over the years when we consider what it means to spend the last night of the year on the town--the trouble of finding a cab, the obnoxious crowds, the challenge of even obtaining a drink, and the almost predictably foul weather. And when weighed against Seelbachs and French 75s, or Airmails and Old Cubans, or even simple Champagne Cocktails, opting to stay in seems almost genius. The only difficult part is choosing what to have. This year while constructing the cocktail menu, the memory of a particularly tasty champagne cocktail popped into my head, the Recoleta. We first encountered this drink over a year ago at Sambar and notoriously, it contained Fernet Branca. The pairing of champagne and Fernet piqued my curiosity and I soon became obsessed with finding it or a similar drink. But to my disappointment, my Internet searches were primarily fruitless. Even uncovering champagne cocktails with any amari turned up few options.
There are books you rip through. There are books you savour by the page and run your hand lightly across the cover with wonder each time you set it aside, safely, for the next time. Megan Abbott has conjured up one of the latter.
There are times in life, including the passing of those we love, that remind us that this life is meant to be lived, not just endured. We create the life we want. I cherish what I have been given and I am inspired by those who have given me an example of what it means to really live, and influence others the way they have done to me. I choose to live. I choose to cherish the simple moments in life. I choose to be a powerhouse of love with rivers of joy and contentment flowing freely from my heart.
And no, we are not tossing it.
DETROIT: Due to a rain delay Friday night, the Rangers game has been postponed for until Saturday, which means there is going to be a double-header today.
But to be sure let's get all scientific and see if these are legit. (I am not really going to get scientific, those brain cells were left in a tiny glass of some unknown black liquor earlier this week.) They match up exactly to the older Explorers that I had stashed.
Back in Leeds, North have announced their annual Belgian Bier Fest will be kicking off on the 7th April. Expect the usual mind-boggling array of Belgian beauties, along with plenty of cheese and bread (one hopes). North's festivals are always worth dropping in on.
In a media release the complementary health council (CHC) of Australia emphasized that the 15 TCM products featured in this study were rogue products seized by Customs as they were found to contain prohibited and undeclared ingredients. The CHC emphasizes the proficiency of rigorous regulatory regime around complementary medicines, i.e. all ingredients used in listed products must be on the permitted list of ingredients. However, Australian regulations do not apply to products purchased online from overseas.
I never dreamed that I’d do this to my physique.
And yes, while some of the media may have had a great deal of influence on me back then, I will also tell you that the other hand responsible for tightening the life draining noose around my neck was in many ways my own. Due to the fact that I wasn't exactly surrounding myself with some of the most positive people out there. I remember how powerful that feeling of desperation was, of wanting to belong and fit in, to be liked by that special guy. How there would be moments when I would feel so irrationally driven to make myself known, to be liked, to be found pretty, or to have that special someone notice me that day. And ultimately find myself doing things that I really didn't want to do, but out of the fear of being labeled weird, or worse being an outcast and rejected, did them anyway. It was like I was consumed with this bottomless hunger for acceptance. And though I wasn't actively pursuing being the school Homecoming Queen or anything like that. The pressure of it all simply got to me just as I'm sure it got to all the "popular kids" I desperately wanted to be accepted by.
Caroline was so serious about trying to get a break as a pop star that she even accepted a singing cameo in Don’t Open ‘Til Christmas in 1984 and co-wrote the song Warrior of Love. Little did she know that her one-day shot was turned into a "starring" role for her on the film’s posters thanks to the producers’ savvy marketing tactics.
My iPhone notes used to be filled with to-do lists that I was constantly updating. You have to admit, crossing things off your to-do list feels like a major accomplishment.
3 tsp. baking powder
I am delighted that blogging friend Jennifer from The Enchanted Bobbin in Canada has joined me for the fourth part of the My Modern Muse series. I came across Jennifer`s blog last summer and was immediately struck by Jennifer`s creativity. She is also super sweet! We have gorgeous weather here at the moment and so Jennifer and I took a stroll around the beautiful Majorelle Gardens and she shared with me a little about what inspires her.
My only qualification for inclusion in that fast-disappearing segment of our population known as, ‘The Greatest Generation’, is the number of rings in my tree trunk. I did nothing brave or outstanding while serving in uniform but, like all the others, I went where I was sent and did what I was ordered to do. If that had meant marching into harm’s way, I most certainly would have done it without hesitation.
so many of you are participating and we love to hop over to each others' blogs,
4. Lil Mama - G-Slide (Tour Bus)
He and his mom sat at the counter sharing Jack stories, as my mind reeled with should have beens. I said to myself, “Jack never got to have a phone, or send a text, or go on a date! He never got to read the latest book in the Inheritance Series, which I already promised I’d buy him for Christmas. He’ll never get to ace his PSAT’s, be in a high school play or go to the freakin’ prom! He’ll never fall in love! He won’t even get to be a teenager! He’ll never get to sit around with his friends doing gross teenage guy things like using words like 'nut sack' or lighting their farts on fire. Never, Never, Never!”
A LEED (leadership in Energy and Environmental Design) Gold Certified Building and the District of Columbia’s first full geothermal school facility, Stoddert was also awarded an inaugural OSSE School Garden Grant to further engage students in garden-based learning and hands-on nutrition education as part of the school’s 4,000 square foot teaching garden and in support of the D.C. Healthy Schools Act.
Which gets me to the good news: I happened to stop by for a retail visit three days before the doors would close forever. While that meant I'd missed most of the goodies (probably better for my post-Christmas wallet), I scooped up a few treasures at the crazy price of $25 each. This stretch-velvet dress by Sandwich was one such bargain -- regularly priced at something around $200.
Yes, I have the compass app on my phone. Yes I've used it for this purpose.
Speaking of God, angelic voices and damnation.
Enter the, common to the Atheists, 'Normalcy bias'.
James is respected as a dedicated British nationalist, and is well known in nationalist circles as a committed activist for the cause. James has stood as a Parliamentary candidate in his constituency of Shrewsbury, and his fiancee Christina Evans has stood previously as a parliamentary candidate in Ludlow. Both are tireless political campaigners with a wide range of experience in organising party members, running groups, organising meetings, running election campaigns and dealing with the media.
Yes, my yarn and patterns talk to me. Don’t yours?
In truth, everyone was utterly charming, and I’m very grateful to The Guardian and the Wellcome Trust for being excellent hosts and for putting on the competition in the first place. Congrats to Tess and Penny!
why does little bear not wear clothes
Hey, fellow Brits, do you remember the Radio Times? It was like a TV Guide and back in the day before having digital boxes with the schedule available on the screen, you needed this to see what would be on TV that night. Every so often they would change the design and the nation would be in uproar.
I am LOVING that the upcoming warmer weather permits me to wear sleeveless tops! Cuz i really HATE sleeves. I dont like to feel anything under my armpits, it irritates the shizzz out of me! & maybe, mayyyybe, i can convince my coworkers im not a cave woman, always grabbing at my armpit..Doubt it...
Now it isn't over, it has been three weeks since my last chemo and radiation session, I have another test on the 19th to see if the cancer has been cleared but I feel awesome. Cancer is not taking my life yet, I have too many people to make happy especially the one woman who made this a better experience....Lu.
meet in a sparkling friendship. Explain that.
"We're going to do the show remotely from different locations every week: bars, lounges, wineries, distilleries, festivals... anywhere, really, where the management insists you show a valid ID to gain entry," Dunn said.
Not marching. Rock. Well, rock/a cappella. We were the All-Nighters. Then they kicked me out and renamed themselves something else. We were pretty terrible. We had a bassist who knew what he was doing, a guitarist who didn’t, a drummer with no drums, a Sanyo (or Casio) keyboard, and a singer who wanted to be Gary Cherone, but only Gary Cherone doing “More Than Words.” Our two big “hits” were “Moon Over Winchendon” and “When You’re Dead.” And when I say “hit” I mean those are the only two song titles I remember. It’s fitting, though, because “When You’re Dead” would feel right at home in REPO.
Memorable Line: “Attaboy, Lieutenant. Make it yourself like a good chap, will you? The bar’s in the globe.”
Police estimate she has spent more than four million won (£2,000) to take the written test, with each test costing 6,000 won, in addition to other expenses.
It is surprising to me how quickly I am able to pick this up. Especially seeing I am still overweight and not in suburb shape. I forget how much strength I have gained doing Pump, it has made trying so many new things
His new novel By Nightfall is a terrific piece of work, a graceful story of love and betrayal with the heft of a book twice its size. What's brilliant is the way he sketches a whole life with the economy of a short-story writer. The story, which lightly echoes Death in Venice, is set against the backdrop of the New York art scene, about which he talked fascinatingly.
Invite my husband for a ballet show (something like Swan Lake) and hear him groan! I think I must have put some trauma into him that day when I literally arm-twisted him to sit through 2 and a half hours of Swan Lake (including intermissions).
And enjoy the sensation and memory of that fog.
I asked the opinion of Alex Petty who organises the Laughing Horse Free Festival; and Peter Buckley Hill who started the free show concept in Edinburgh and runs the original PBH Free Fringe shows.
Tom Brokaw called the generation that came through the Great Depression and defeated Nazi Germany and Japan “The Greatest Generation.”
I’m not sure that I ever really understood that the Lord Ruler was such a very powerful allomancer (or whatever magic it is he’s using). Working his magic over all those people in the crowd during the executions – most peculiar, not to mention extremely demonstrative! Also, he finally did put in an appearance – unfortunately – and he does seem fairly invincible. I was racking my brains for something, some similarity to anything that might give me a clue as to what he is. The nearest I can come to is a book I recently read about immortals who also couldn’t be killed without a great deal of effort. I was also intrigued about the Inquisitors interest in Vin. They are very keen to locate her – clearly the Lord Ruler has something to fear from her but I really don’t know what. Perhaps she will be the one who can use the eleventh metal. Anyway, if I didn’t already think he deserved to die (which I did), executing all those people and then killing Kelsier has certainly not improved my mood towards him at all! Do I think he’s invincible – last week I said I thought he could be beaten and so foolish consistency it may be but I’m going to stick with that theory.
JESUS IS DOWN THE ROAD.
I’m walking down the street and this time everybody can see me. I’m not a suburban ghost today; I don’t pass in silhouette or glide between the cracks. I’m quite aware that I don’t look too good. Why the fuck should I? I don’t feel very good so why try to fool all these lovely strangers or myself.
This all sounds like an excuse, doesn't it? It is an excuse. Excuse me for not going overboard in my eating just to satisfy a curiosity.
Mr. Vittles grandparents lived down there when he was growing up, so I'm assuming that's how he got introduced. As for me, my mom's parents had a second home down there and I eventually went to college in Sarasota.
This article shows how to select hinges.You’d be surprised by the variety of hinge hardware. They vary by size, by weight and by shape. They are available in a variety of materials, such as brass and steel.
I got the MME kit from Scrapbook Steals a couple of weeks ago along with the other Miss Caroline sets, I couldn't chose between them.
“Satchurated 3D” DVD is #3!!! Big thanks to all of my fans worldwide for making this happen. See you out there on the road!”
For me, the present life meant sources to find money. Either money should be abolished. A society that eradicates need for accumulation of money and wealth. Or money eradicates this Society.
Al Qaeda in Iraq, Al Qaeda in the Arabian Peninsula (AQAP), the Libya Islamic Fighting Group (LIFG), Al Shaabab (Somalia), Al-Qaeda in the Islamic Maghreb, Jaish-e-Mohammed (JEM) (Army of Mohammed) (Pakistan), Jemaah Islamiya organization (JI) (Indonesia) Islamic Movement of Uzbekistan, etc. (See US State Department Foreign Terrorist Organizations, United Nations Security Council, List of individuals, groups, undertakings and other entities associated with Al-Qaida Al-Qaida Sanctions List)
When homes are cold and damp it takes more energy to heat to a comfortable temperature and heating your home efficiently not only helps reduce condensation, but could also save money on your heating bills. Tenants were advised to keep their home above 18 degrees C (63 F) or to a comfortable heat around 21 degrees C (70 F).”
But this week we have entered new phase of joy from children...the inadvertantly saying dirty things phase.
kAryANi na manorathaih
And so I conclude this short series that lacked a specific purpose to move onto topics more likely to have a coherent meaning.
museum
Under the Labor Theory of Value, an object's worth is said to not be based on subjective utility but rather on the labor added to the object. Yet, in a common refutation of this theory, let us consider the case of a painting. How can this theory be valid when a painting's value rises after the death of its creator, even after no additional labor has been expended? Marx could not explain this phenomena. Only the subjective value theory can explain value.
The only real ally we have in the Middle East is Israel, whom Obama continuously insults and disrespects, prompting Benjamin Netanyahu to deliver a bitch slap to Obama’s oversized ego.
I have posted 32 items so far in my Etsy store Wood in Vintage and I will be adding more soon! I just got my new product photography light in and I can't wait to use it. I took some pictures before it arrived but they looked yellowy since I had changed a lightbulb on the chandelier and so they are unusable, boo. I take my pictures on the dining room table and in fact he whole dining room is an art studio and I even have art supplies in the 2 little guest rooms. We took the beds down, lol so no more guests just art! I haven't been able to leave the house (without a lot of pain) for years so it's amazing how full the house has gotten with all of the things I want to make and do. My husband says just leave him a path to his big chair so he can watch football and he will be happy, lol. No, the house doesn't look like an episode of Hoarders but it does look like one big art studio! I want to do so many things and like everyone else there just aren't enough hours in the day. I am just so blessed to have a husband that sees to it that I have everything I want and need. Haha, we put the new product photography light together and we walked around and around, light in hand, looking for a spot to put it. I looked at Keith and I said, "We need a bigger house!". He shook his head yes but in the end we decided the light looked good sitting on top of the treadmill. Lol.
Tattoo: Kawaii Fair 2- Endless Pain Tattoo- (Kawaii Fair)
Forest Of The Dead
What happened at Krue Se eight Aprils ago remains one of the worst episodes of state-committed violence in our modern history. Worse, if we allow the vice of faceless statistics, than the killings of 91 protesters at Ratchaprasong in 2010 by “unknown” parties. Worse, because at Krue Se, we know who was fighting who, and who killed who. Investigations long concluded that the military over-reacted, but no charges were pressed.
The front door was ten feet high if it was an inch and emblazoned with a coat of arms that featured a mounted knight carrying a lance, who, instead of wearing a helmet, had on some kind of fedora. It swung open without a sound, revealing the little guy from the gatehouse, wearing a tuxedo with a morning coat. He smiled, if you could call it that—it more like a chimp baring its teeth.
We go to a nearby camp site next to a reservoir where we're kept awake by coyotes howling all night then, the next day, drive another 20 miles down a dirt road to a trail head where we hike into the mountains and camp for a few days (a whole other story). On the way home we stop in Pendleton, a more yuppie cowboy town, where women wear tight jeans and high heeled cowboy boots and the most popular place in town is the rockin' steakhouse with a mediocre cover band playing outdoors. This is the kind of place I could imagine staying in a B&B to experience truck driving, cowboy hat-wearing hunting culture with a gentrified buffer - kind of like folks in a resort and a tour bus might see Istanbul or Beijing. It's cool but I like Union's gas station better.
The house was quiet and the world was calm.
Update March 13, 2012
this hard-won chance,
6) Rocket launches, Japan shoots it down.
Moments from giving-up.
Let’s start with the Riddler. This should be an easy warm-up before things start getting freaky. In this way we should hope to flawlessly recast Batman Forever for its eventual remake.
Me: That sounds painful.
I am driving. I stop at a red light, and to my right is a Christmas tree lot, surrounded with white twinkling lights and populated with a few straggling couples and families, making shapes and measuring with their hands, cold in the December evening air. I watch their breath go in and out. The wind blows in gusts across the tops of the palms and the firs, and Christmas music plays from our local radio station " Christmas Music Around the Clock ", the tagline. The sky is silver and blue and white, and a small flock of common birds move up and down in formation over cars. We have to move, and we have little money. You lost your business years ago, and it still hurts you. It hurts you that you lost something you fought and worked so hard for, because you wanted to give it to your family, like a gift in hand. You wanted to take care of us, like all good men want to do. You want to protect our children, and I want to protect our children. We want them to have dental work, and tutors so that they can catch up in subjects that are difficult, so that they can get good grades, so that they can get scholarships and go to colleges and grow up to be able to pay for good dental work. We want them to have health insurance that doesn't break the bones of our family budget, we want them to thrive. The Kaiser ads: THRIVE. We count the four beautiful heads of our children, and each Kaiser ad that demands they thrive but omits the cost, $200. each head. We want to protect ourselves, too, from the weight and stress and fears that keep us awake at night; but we will not move our children from here, from this town, where they have the best schools and the safest neighborhoods and most importantly and significantly, Grandma and Grandpa and Grandma. Those older and kinder and doting faces of the family that loves them, that watches them in hourly timed increments from the time they are in size 2 diapers and cut their first teeth. We will, at almost any cost, find a way to stay here. Your business, my faulty hormones and three surgeries, medical debt, and choices we made and didn't make, long ago- here we are, with so little. We might argue about the cost of Christmas presents, or who will make dinner, or the lights left on, we are moving in less than a month and don't know where we are going or what will happen, we might be dancing around each other, or screaming silently, or holding our breath in separate rooms. Lola chips a tooth. As I hold her and look at your face over her sobbing, I know we are both thinking about that dental bill. We might fight about it all until each of us has torn down everything best in the other. We could, but we don't.
For women accustomed to spending $10 to $50 per month on the Pill, these alternatives are simply unaffordable, unless they are covered by health insurance.
This year seemed to fly by, but at the same time it seemed to be awfully long!
Below is an email that I received from a pastor in our network this week from Kenya. I asked his permission to share this with others as I think it is a huge testimony to the power of grace (Jesus) in a person’s life.
An obvious substitution is getting rid of Double Punch; that one point probably isn't worth it, and better used on more into the Deft branch. Extra Powder and 5 point aren't necessary for the build either, but are useful stand alones. If they aren't your thing, you could add more into hp for lasting longer, luck to avoid statuses, or even more into lightning fast for more speed if that's your thing.
Ever feel like you are driving in circles? Passing the same scenery and desperately seeking the right exit ramp. God is forcing me to take the wheel. I just have to trust in Him that I know how to drive.
The top remaining seed in the West is now gone and the whole second round in that conference could be settled tonight.
"Most writers already know to edit out places where they have literally repeated a word or phrase. But the repetition of an effect can be just as problematic. Whether it's two sentences that convey the same information, two paragraphs that establish the same personality trait, or two characters who fill the same role in the plot, repetition can rob your writing of its power" (pgs 175-176).
learning to say less
I'm glad to have let go of the protective health fanatic persona that used to try to run the show. Now, food is a dance between following our senses, our associations, our opportunities for something new and different and following our knowledge. Hopefully, we have left behind the fear.
The following day, my mother took us to the neighborhood playground. I searched the area until I spotted Dickwad the III traumatizing some smaller kids over by the swings. I couldn't take his arrogance any longer. Holding Iño at arm's length like a shield, he and I charged like the pair of enraged banshees we were and confronted Dickwad the III's tyranny head-on!
Commonwealth Games Delhi is just 66 days to go. And this tuesday, the completely remodelled Jawaharlal Nehru Stadium, where the opening and closing ceremony of the games is about to be held, is been inaugurated by Indian Sports Minister MS Gill and Delhi Chief Minister Sheila Dikshit. This stadium was remodelled at the cost of Rs.960 crores. The stadium had delayed opening because of the delay in the construction of underground tunnel to the stadium.
My question is, in this current term in office since 2006, what have the Malay MPs done to improve the situation of at risk Malay youths? As we can all see they have slacked and have delivered hardly any decent needed progress on this issue. In fact, one cannot recollect of any major measure that they had implemented. Minister Yaacob still insist on claiming that “progress has been made by Malay youths in education” while the gaps between Malay youths and other ethnic groups remain alarmingly wide. In fact there is also no indication of any cosmetic improvement in the educational outcomes of Malay youths.
Led Zeppelin: Whole Lotta Love
The ability to be fully alert and active without ever having to sleep again. And a life-span of 200 healthy years. Please. I have a lot of things to do.
U.S. submarines having gone rogue from the Cabal and in command of Uncompromised White Hats attacked and destroyed two Song Class Chinese subs off the coast of Oregon. The ocean explosions registered as a 6.0 geographical anamoly.
Having decided to mix tattooing with tech, Marc streamed the whole tattooing process live on Facebook, encouraging users to voice their thoughts and questions while he worked. Questions such as: ‘You know that’s permanent, right?’
“Unfortunately the two kids who ended up in the river in Gisborne on Thursday, they’re classic, they’re mobile having a look around being adventurous.”
People - finding a useful tutorial, like a real how-to, for making lip balm that tells you proper quantities, sources and expected output is about impossible.
Create manageable steps. Break your overall goal into a series of smaller goals that are doable and will foster success.
As soon as Bruno’s name was made public by this writer, we were contacted by a senior P2 Lodge member who offered “an international scoop,” involving impossible amounts of Philippine gold, UN Secretary General Ban Ki Moon and an individual by the name of Marco Di Mauro.
Steve Miller wants to make hops, a key ingredient in beer, a cash crop in New York State once again.
Bearing, for freedon's sake, an alien yoke;
Donato Giancola
It is like a cowboy version of Vegas. In fact you can even get a shirt saying you have been to ‘Nash Vegas’. I opted for the cowboy hat…
03) Jellybelly
· Seth Goldstein, co-founder and chairman, Turntable.fm
As I look back with warm nostalgia, I realize that this was just an opportunity for Phroney…it was a way for him to have—for once—something good and home-made by others. I wonder if it was an indication of more than just a hankering for these fine and beautiful cakes. Maybe it was a desire, too, to fill his lonely life once a year with some other kinds of home-baked goodness.
You glance down at an incoming text while an employee is talking to you. DUMB! Or you bark “Just get it done!” to your team and then walk away. DUMB!
We, The Prayer Team, are with you now in thought and spirit. We send you energy and love from our souls to yours and we pray that you will all feel it and know how very loved you are.
“We’ll hear a play to-morrow,” says Hamlet to the players. Of course, he’d see the play as well as hear it, but “We’ll see and hear a play tomorrow” is far too clumsy a line for Shakespeare to write, and, given the choice between “see a play” and “hear a play”, Shakespeare opted, rather interestingly, for the latter. If an order of importance is to be established, hearing comes before seeing.
hold your neighbors’ hands,
and telling himself he was a "pretty boy"
Bama-12 yrs
Mix until butter and flour begin to look pebbly, with pieces about the size of peas, 30 to 40 seconds after all the butter is added. Add reserved 1 cup egg mixture, mixing on lowest speed until until incorporated, about 10 seconds. Increase speed to medium-high and beat until light and fluffy, about 1 minute.
There are also The Wine Buffs stamp sets...I used the tiny cork and corkscrew from The Wine Buffs Celebrate to stamp a small embellishment from a scrap of paper (saved from my fussy cutting) for my first card, coloring it with Copic markers, circle-punching it and edging it in gray to match the color of the edge around the larger image...they're faux-layered. :)
Are you still with me, or did I cause your eyes to glaze over with my scholarly stuff? :)
And so do Sullivan and his guide. “We squeezed through on our bellies,” he writes. “The squeeze got tight enough that, as I wriggled on my stomach, the ceiling was scraping my back…” His guide mentions that “they’d had to dig a couple of people out.”
I will show you that I’m not insane.
Most significant, however, was the arrest of Soumaila Cissé, who frequently served in governments during both terms of President Alpha Oumar Konaré (1992-2002) and who lost the second round of Mali’s presidential election to ATT. Unlike the others arrested (with the possible exception of Babaly Ba), Cissé has no direct links to the ATT regime. He spent most of the last decade in Burkina Faso, where he chaired the body that oversees the region’s common currency.
I will go on regardless
Through that doorway you can catch a glimpse of...
Also, cool it with the moral judgements – it’s not the weed that you dislike, it’s the stoners. I’m with you on it, trust me, there is nothing more annoying to me than a slow-witted goon telling me that drugs has given them real, lasting experiences or new understandings about the world – but that’s a problem I have with people, not the drugs themselves. All of the problems you list : that it leads to inactivity, that it is a crutch or shield from deeper psychological problems, and that it can be addictive – these are all problems, but they are properties of the users, not the drugs. Trying to blame it on drugs is like trying to blame the bridge that people jump off for their suicide. There is nothing in the act of getting high that makes it bad, and with weed, it is extremely hard to cook up extrinsically damaging properties.
But we were two on the earth
Pearls: dollar store
Thanks for stopping by....come back again soon!
In summary, welcome to Huntah- we’re not Vail. Did I say it was sunny???? I hope not. That’s for tomorrow.
His jaw tightens and his eyes fill with anger. "Don't talk like that. Don't-"
‘I thought that was really unfair and didn’t make any sense. It’s unprofessional.’
34. Janna Levin "How the Universe Got Its Spots"
But can Sherry keep her family and Joshua safe, when his desire for vengeance threatens them all?
The day I received the Seren contract was a particularly surreal one. For also in post that day arrived a copy of a record contract (no less) for the inclusion of a song I had co-written in the 80s (when I was all of fifteen-years old) on a soon-to-be-released album of Irish Electronica.
After a few miles I went to my back brakes for some slow and whoa. The handle went to the bars with little slow and definitely no whoa. I suddenly remembered my last ride on Friday. One of the pads had come loose. I made a mental note to fix it when I got home. Mental is the key word here. If I don't write it down these days, it didn't happen. So...it didn't happen.
Apparently, and how I missed this being on the planet so long I have no idea, a cast iron skillet must be seasoned, something to do with creating and preserving the non-stick coating, and it takes time to get it just right, and you’re not supposed to scrub it, or use boiling water, honey, you’re supposed to scrape off food and lightly massage it with rock salt and smear it with oil and cover it with foil and I don’t know, suck its toes or something. I’m not going to Google that for you, but hey…
I was supposed to be doing some sewing this morning while Sam is at pre school but my sewing mojo seems to have deserted me so I'm back on the computer looking back at my blog over the last year. What a year its been! I seem to have bought a LOT of fabric but actually did much less sewing (I blame facebook/Twitter/blogging/Pinterest!) I have enjoyed taking part in swaps, I've hosted giveaways and reviewed products. Best of all I have connected with lots of lovely like minded people and discovered some fantastic, inspiring new blogs.
“Yes, but it’s tailored,” I pointed out. “You’re secure enough in your masculinity to wear pink, aren’t you?”
Actors: Leonardo DiCaprio, Matt Damon, Jack Nicholson, Mark Wahlberg, Martin Sheen, Ray Winstone, Vera Farmiga, Anthony Anderson, Alec Baldwin, Kevin Corrigan, James Badge Dale
Don’t be deceived by her mild mannered appearance. She could easily take out that stubby-legged knight. Just look at her smile. She’ll mop the floor with him!
Money Remaining: $274,688
I forgive myself for accepting and allowing myself to feel no up to the challenge to actually restore my own self dignity so that I actually see myself as worthy to walk an agreement/relationship with another.
“It doesn’t matter what is true, it only matters what people believe is true.”
As a result, members of the gang were allowed to continue their abuse.
An April 2010 survey titled " Muslims in Leicester " says that Muslims in the city are especially prone to underachievement and unemployment. The report says the inner city Spinney Hills neighbourhood, which has the highest percentage of Muslims in the city, is also the ward with the lowest rate of full-time employment, the highest rate of unemployment, the highest level of economic inactivity, the highest percentage of "no qualifications" for work and the highest level of social housing.
Exurbia
We do sometimes use a version of time-out, in conjunction with sitting "knee to knee" if either my husband or I feel that there is a need, but not to be punitive as much as giving them a chance to be apart from each other and a chance to calm down, regroup, and reflect before sitting "knee to knee." They are supposed to use the time to "do some thinking", which also in most cases, includes a few seconds where they ask God to help them. As a family, we believe in the Golden Rule, so if they have done something that is not in line with this, we want them to reflect on this to ask God for help.
Slave of the Word also has an article providing links to a series of talks given at a symposium at Liberty University. There are talks by supporters for the NIV, ESV, and HCSB. While I have not found time yet to listen to all of these, what I have listen to so far is well worth the time.
There are many things that my girls learned from gardening, from the most basic lesson of plant germination, the lesson of importance of sunshine and need to make sure that the plants have the correct amount of water and nutrients.
a monster....
Run at least 12 races. - This seems silly for a race-aholic, but I hope to do a lot more marathons this year which means I'm going to have to give up some of the other races so that I can get in the right miles. I think last year, I ran almost every weekend in January and February and I'm giving that up so I can focus on the ultra.
That possibility is ours as well. It will be so much better to be with the Lord. I am sure I can speak for many of you. In your Christian life you are growing in grace. The more love of Christ you realize in your own mind the more wearisome the thing of this earth become. You are becoming homesick for heaven. Be that as it may the Lord keeps you here as His ambassador.
Thank you Maralyn, Sheila and Lynn for contributing to 'SIBOL'.
Serving & Glassware
Sally Rand is the world’s most famous fan dancer. The act consisted of Rand playfully covering and uncovering parts of her body with two ostrich feathers to the tune of “Clare de Lune”– but never revealing the naughty bits. This was her act in burlesque, however. Her work in vaudeville was a little tamer.
Kambei Shimada: As a matter of fact, I'm preparing for a tough war. It will bring us neither money nor fame. Want to join?
Dave: a quite man, I know Jansen hasn’t quite forgiven the lad for breaking Lani’s heart. I can’t say I’m all kittens and sunshine with him either, but he’s got an impressive skill set. Eyes like a hawk, temperament of a house cat, and did I mention the lad can wield a blade? I think he’ll be a good match for the Guild. I’d like to see him loosen up a tad, but he gets the job done. Aye. As of now he’ll have my full vote when it comes down to it.
For the dough, you will have to mix the dry ingredients together first and then using the rubbing-in method, mix them with the butter. Then make a hole in the middle of the mixture and add in the eggyolks and vanilla essence. Mix again thoroughly.
ON YOUR BIKE
fettered to the kitchen
You will need to cut your bread into 1/2 inch oblong rounds. I lightly spread them with olive oil, rub them with garlic or use garlic powder and toast them until they are golden brown. This can also be done the night before as well. It is key for good Crostini to be crisp and not chewy.
“Our car’s balance is very good,” said Patrick Long. “Between the final practice and the qualifying we changed a couple of things on the car and that worked well. My quickest lap was perfect. We have an excellent set-up for the race.”
This is exactly the political problem that grows out of the presence of races and immigrants. With these admitted to the suffrage on the basis of mere manhood inspired by a generosity unknown to the people of any other land, the machinery of representative government inherited from England does not, for some reason, permit the free choice of leaders. (3)
Siblings: Shongile female, 2:1 male
Lighthouse Family Life Help line Ministry believes that the family (as God has ordained it to be—man, woman and children) is under attack from every direction. These attacks must be countered with relative efforts from the Body of Christ in the areas of teaching, support, prayer and discipleship if there is to be a legacy of faith to hand down to the next generation.
1. SEA SONG (5:34)
C.K. Garner
I am lucky enough to have 2000 LIKES (FB), 124 Blog followers and 71 Twitter followers.
But don't let that put you off. Please! Someone's got to win it and it could be you!
Such is the fate of all wonderful things.
"But this is the first time we've seen someone flossing their teeth at the wheel. It was a quite bizarre sight.
From 2005 to 2008, I was 5’0” feet tall and 130 lbs heavy. For my height and built and according to the standard of most nutritionists—I was +-30 lbs overweight.
Eulogy sank back, nonplussed by this man who was overbearing, arrogant, domineering and yet strikingly handsome and utterly charming when he wished. That Huntley tolerated the old tom cat was unmistakably attractive and set Eulogy wondering if his bluster was just that…an act. His hooded eyes lifted to meet her gaze, and a moment of understanding passed between them that shook Eulogy to the core.
“They’re not conservationists, they’re obstructionists,” he said. “I’m a bit upset about the whole process. And I don’t think it’s necessary at this point to build a downtown bridge, especially redoing all of Spaghetti Junction and throwing all of that in and expect Indiana to pay because of what Kentucky should have done years and years ago.”
- Heart damage
So you know how they say smoking is bad for your health?
I don’t want to finish on WordPress here, we have fun swapping pictures and info!
I'm going to get out of bed---if I see a black cat, I'll let my dog chase it, if there is a crack in the path on the way to the beach, I'll probably tread on it, if there is a ladder I'll go around it or under it--whatever is easiest.
The transition to Maine from our Maryland dairy had its confusing moments. In Maryland the first day of spring meant the beginning of warm sunny days and flowers blooming everywhere. In Maine the first day of spring was just another number on the calendar. The first day of spring in Maine should really be during the usual ice out of Big Wood Pond, around the first week of May.
The auditor-general reported that the chief industrial technician at the Department of Water Affairs and Forestry approved payment of R171000 to a company owned by a spouse. Tax invoices from the company to the department were made out for the attention of “the chief industrial technician”.
In endlessly unexpected ways, they tell me I have understood the core conflict of their lives. A few of them tell me off as well, furious with what I’ve made them experience. (With that in mind, it's curious to imagine the fanmail I might have inflicted on the authors who adopted my ghosted novels. I did some bad things in those books.)
Hello everyone and welcome to the Penny Black Saturday Challenge.
Well of course I didn't, who has the time or space on their hard drive to copy all of their blog posts??
And, do you see how blogging is so much more fun than life, itself? Which is why I am writing this and not dealing with getting another quote. Better get to work on that before AA Hubby calls for an update.
Sometimes, I guess, all you can do is give the person you care for the benefit of the doubt and pray they don’t prove you wrong
My feet crunch below me, each crunch stomping out another killing emotion. It didn’t feel like winter was approaching earlier, but I know that it is now. I feel the chill begin to hug me as I leave behind the sun and just need to get back home, sit back and sleep. A good sleep, a sleep in which in my dreams, good things happen and I finally feel good sensations spread across, and within every inch and fibre of my body.
praaNaayaama is the control of the air we breathe out.
Last night met with the doc, and was very happy to get a near all clear, my cholesterol & blood sugar were normal, yay, I don't have any diseases woohoo, the only sub normal result was for Rubella.
But respect for life is not just a religious value; it’s a foundational value of all societies in which reasonable people would want to live.
Masterpieces of Religious Verse (1948) # 298
all the pieces-- they're all here
A massive landslide started, taking with it ten houses.
* Place your royal icing toppers on top of your cupcakes the day you are serving your cupcakes. If you leave them on overnight, the toppers may wilt and the colors may bleed onto your frosting (not very attractive when black royal icing bleeds onto white frosting!)
What a turd.
Today I have a good mindset. A positive outlook. See, yesterday...oh yesterday, can I re-do yesterday? Sonja K. was here, and I had all sorts of hopeful ideas about bonding with her, but the day flew by so fast. Then I got to feeling sorry for myself because of so much work work work all the time, and sort of forgot all the important stuff, temporarily. I was seeing what was before me, giving in to grumbling, NOT counting my blessings. In the late evening, I had to drive to the small city, and took Suzanne with me, which was really really nice. We stopped in Wegman's really fast for an Easter ham, some potatoes, milk, pasta sauce, romaine, eggs, and some Twizzlers for the ride home. Not for ME, for Suzanne and Mali and her friend. Suze chatted the whole way, and I was glad to give her 100% of my attention.
Question VI. In the same strain of charitable hypothesis it is affirmed that infants" so baptized," namely, not merely according to the institution of Christ, but, with "the stipulation (the answer) of a good conscience towards God," are born again of water and of the Holy Ghost; (Question VII. ) it being impossible that such dispositions and fruits should exist, except when the Holy Ghost has imparted a new nature, which He may do before baptism, in baptism, or after baptism, "as He listeth."
First up is this awesome take on an old paper folding technique: This one is done using felt,but I made up my own using fabric. If you want me to do up a tut, let me know and I'll tell you how I did it.
So the judges unceremoniously gave Gavin the boot, and Urkel lives to dance another week.
sanities!
make it a party in order to honor the birthday person and make it special!
Interesting crackers with a squeeze container of hummus, roasted edamame (we both really liked these – we found the same brand at Whole Foods. Try the wasabi version – it’ll clear your sinuses!), fruit and nut mix and some semi-high-end chocolate… a nice change of pace from the usual post-race fare!
Risk taking that first step- even if you don’t know where it will lead.
It is just true. 1 John 4:18: “There is no fear in love; but perfect love casteth out fear”. I cannot live in fear any more. It is uncreative. It restricts me, it prevents me from doing what I need to do. It is time to see and act in Love. When I respond in fear, I am not really seeing the other person. I need Love in order to see the other person.
Which explains why you don't see many claims like "the Salieri of Flugelhorns!"
But thanks to another Web site that hasn’t been updated in 11 years, you can still Google Manring & Malamud and get one hit. It won’t get you to the article,but there are worse people to end up with in a Google pairing.
Once-Proud Politicians Cornered Like Rats!
First, a thank you to all who came and participated in our discussion of the third chakra. It was wonderful to hear of your experiences and to have you share your insights in this area of your life.
Back then to His throne and crown.
So I got my White Fringe and away she goes. I colored her up in Copics and where he little thin straps are for her top, I used those as the cutoff for the blue sleeves.
Cleaning a subway or fixing a window will not solve the problem. No one holding a gun says to himself, “I’m not going to go shoot this guy because they really cleaned up the neighborhood recently.” The broken windows theory seems to be a classic case of mistaking an effect for a cause. It does serve the purpose of providing easy, doable solutions to deep, intractable problems like unemployment and poverty, though. And for that reason, it makes sense that its popularity has been so durable.
Thanks for visiting. Cheers!
their relationship to the alleged abusers, the nature of the abuse, and the time
The administrative punishment advance notice should be delivered directly to the parties by the copyright administrative management entity, the parties should sign or stamp the delivery form. If parties refuse to sign for receipt, the situation should be noted clearly by the delivery personnel, the documents to be delivered should be left at the domicile receiving the delivery personnel, and the person in charge of the relevant entity should be informed. The copyright administrative management entity may also adopt postal delivery methods to inform the parties. If there is no way to find the parties, they may notify by public proclamation.
Once upon a time, (just yesterday), I came upon some small white baskets in the dollar section of Target.
The stuff you learn on the Interchocolates, I swear!
Western Oregon University is hosting the University of Washington Canadian Fulbright fellow, Claudio Aporta, on Wednesday, April 11. His presentation, free and open to the public, will be held at noon in the Willamette Room of Werner University Center. Aporta’s talk is titled “Trails and Their Role in the Construction of the Inuit pan-Arctic Identities.” This event is sponsored by WOU’s Canadian Studies program, with the assistance of the Government of Canada/avec l’appui du gouvernement du Canada.
Which leads me to speak of Jason Mraz’s new album which totally rocks my toe socks off… If I had them on right now. I should, it’s freezing in this house… anyway, that comes later. Take a listen to Jason Mraz’s new album, ‘love is a four letter word’ (as offensive as that sounds, the music consists of happy, up-beat music that is totally without any four-letter words, excluding ‘love’ of course). Preferably listen to it with headphones that work.
Incidentally, I was able to find online in about 90 seconds a 2010 Yellow Tail Chardonnay in a variety of stores ranging from under $5 to $6.33 in New York, New Jersey, and Washington, while the writer of the aforementioned article merely found that Pennsylvania, at $8, was cheaper than one New Jersey store.Dead on the money, so to speak, and the bolded bits strike home to the real problem with the PLCB: the monopolistic nature of it. They have no real competition when it comes to Pennsylvanians, and we are a captive audience, forced to buy at these stores by the coercion of law.And yet...we put up with that, and seem willing to allow legislators like Senator John Pippy run our lives and make our decisions. For God's sake, Pennsylvanians, stand up on your hind legs and act like adults. Tell your legislator that you don't need to be CONTROLLED any longer.
*”That’s for nothing, so look out.”
33Which God has now put into effect for our children, by sending Jesus; as it says in the second Psalm, You are my Son; this day I have given you being.
Despite the downward trend in the use of credit, China is still in a massive credit bubble and is starting to experience the delirium tremors of its credit mania withdrawal.
Bad Press Is Better Than No Press
Some of you may not know that I (Anna) am also a fine art painter. One of my paintings has become the cover art for this amazing book written by a very good friend of mine. The book is about a man searching for a path to enlightenment and his travels in Asia with a western born monk. Reading the book changed my life and I was over the moon to be given the opportunity to have my art on the cover. I am so excited about this for so many reasons!! *bounces around the room happily*
You have until Sunday at noon EST to leave your comments. Good luck, the lucky winner may be YOU!!! You have 6 chances to win Check back here to the JR blog on Sunday Evening to find out who the six lucky winners are!! Enjoy the Hop!!!
And you’re treated like a fool,
1-2‘Short Stage’ by NUI Galway (3 one-act plays)
OSI goes well beyond being progressive metal. It’s one of those pieces of work that demands full attention from the listener, and it could end up getting heavy play once you make the investment. But it’s well worth that investment.
3 refined
The confusion over treaty rights and special privileges is similar to how most Americans view reservations in general. The idea that reservations or fishing and hunting rights are something the Americans “gave” to the Indians after defeating them in war is absolutely ridiculous. Reservations are instead usually the one thing the Americans didn’t take after forcing Indians to compromise over endless war or peace. The Ojibwe word for reservation, ishkonigan, also means “leftovers.” The “welfare” the U.S. government gives to recognized tribes every year for healthcare, housing, food, etc. are terms the government agreed to in order to take the land. And they took almost all it. Even on reservations themselves, there are more white residents than enrolled tribal members. Of course, if the Americans are really upset about the terms of the agreement, they can always give back all the land or maybe start paying rent.
Now I know what you’re thinking. You think leopard print is tacky. The domain of trailer trash and flashy strippers.You’re probably right.
Bettie Serveert Kid’s allright NL
The Washington Post Company ranked Quinnipiac 49 on its list of Top 100 Social Media Colleges list. The list is scientifically calculated to highlight the colleges and universities best using social media.
Because the Ivy's facade keeps its secrets so well, there is much day dreaming a girl walking past every day can do. In her mind's eye she draws pictures of the decor, the fine clientèle and beautiful food. Everything at The Ivy must be fabulous. It's what she encouraged herself to believe.
1 crooked
Row 32- ch1, turn, sc in 4, sc dec, sc in 8, sc dec, (sc in 10, sc dec) 4 times, sc in 6, sc dec, sc in last 4, (69)
The following is my email reply when he told me about the essay tribute:
Natty is enjoying fifth grade and is actually being very responsible about his homework. I finally found a system that works well for him. Money. He is given 10 points each day for homework. Five points are allotted to his planner. He has space for five subjects. He has to have SOMETHING written in each subject to receive his points for the day. The other five points are allotted to getting the work actually done. Since we implemented this system, he has only missed one day of not having his planner filled out. Oh - and each point is worth a penny. Just my price. It does add up (along with some other things that he is expected to do each day for his chores) but I don't mind paying him to be responsible. That's what happens at our jobs as adults, isn't it?
To all of you who have been curious about our market but managed to get to Durban on the first weekend of the month,
- Bubble juice, SUPER bubble juice is sticky like glue.
When the sparks start to fly, Savannah lays down the ground rules: no personal complications. If she can turn off the tingle she feels every time Cole gives her a hot stare with his gorgeous baby blues, he can turn off his desire as well. But for two people determined to have it all, a hands-off policy can only last so long before one of them yields.
The EIC6 challenge was to incorporate black and white with any shade of blue. Since those are the Stallion/Peak wrestling colors this worked out perfectly!
Have to light a fire under CE’s ass because he has 9 other properties he oversees and yeah, ok, mine is the red-headed stepchild of the company but still, I need attention over here! We’re the old man property- crotchety and mean. And get angry when we’re not taken care of. So I am the buildings advocate, speaking up in times of need, and getting what this place needs, and if that requires an actual sticky note, dictated to me by the CE, to call to harp on him to get something done, then by God, I’ll do it. And I have. It plays in my favor that the CE adores me. I confirmed with him yesterday actually “and you want me to start harassing you tomorrow about the ice machine? by email or text or good old fashioned phone call?” “good old fashioned phone call, and keep doing it every day until I give you a packing order that its on its way.” Any other manager, uh-uh. No way, no how would he allow them to do this. It’s great. really. And not a power I plan on ever abusing. (unless absolutely necessary).
As long as they’re given transparency and control, consumers are becoming quite comfortable with these kinds of interactions. In the future, they’ll expect them. When that happens, the question won’t be “How much do you know about me?” but “What are you going to do with what you’ve found?”
* Tilda Swinton – excellent governess, but milk too cold for a baby?
every detail, the inclusion of the olive branch is deliberate and therefore important; and teaches us great truths about God, and the overall story of redemption.
from the wedding reception in gift money to start
Guns are also a valuable tool for self-defense. A gun is an equalizer. This means that a gun allows a small or un-athletic person to defend themselves from a criminal no matter how big or strong the criminal may be. Guns are also a great crime deterrent. When a criminal thinks you might be armed, he is less likely to choose you as a victim. The right to defend oneself from criminals is a basic human right, and a gun is one of the best tools to protect yourself, as well as your family, from crime. Forty-six percent of gun owners report owning guns for protection from crime.
When Jesus came to Birmingham they simply passed Him by,
I went into a Major Top Quality Female Stratopheric Stroppy Strop.
I'm on holiday from tomorrow, and to the best of my abilities, I've been frantically clearing my inbox this week. This isn't an easy thing for an agent to do, because for every email you answer, another two seem to take it's place!
The truth lies somewhere between: Fat Tire will satisfy none of the beer drinkers who find delight in robust, characterful, hoppy Oregon beers. (The brewer, Peter Bouckaert, in describing how to brew a clone of this beer to Brew Your Own magazine, cautioned: "don't use Cascade or other overpowering hops." Cascades, gentle and aromatic, are the most common and beloved hops in Oregon ales.) But neither will they dump out their bottle.
7And I heard another out of the altar say, Even so, Lord God Almighty, true and righteous are thy judgments.
I’ll be honest here… I probably wouldn’t have picked up this book had I not seen the trailer for the movie and fell in love with it. Yes, it was on my To-Read list, but I wasn’t really all that excited to read it, despite the high ratings it has on Goodreads… mostly due to an unpleasant experience I had with one book I picked by relying on GR ratings – A Visit from the Goon Squad by Jennifer Egan. That book was so awful Arty and I couldn’t even bring ourselves to review it. But… anyway.
of his reality. Awaiting for me there, were a family
She dropped the rose
Kelsey
Anyways, the double album was just the beginning, as Jeff Wayne's War of the Worlds adaptation was itself adapted into at least two video games (the previously mentioned 1984 disaster and another in 1998) and also an animated version that never saw the light of day. But the most successful adaptation of the adaptation was the stage version, which hit the road in 2007 and has covered England, Ireland, and Australia since.
Drug offences have actually fallen slightly in the last 10 years, from 524 in 2002 to 441 in 2011.
So anyway! All those things got her attention but she barely popped her head up higher then normal and mainly just pricked her ears and looked. The clapping did get a bit of a skitter, lol, but nothing serious. This was of course at the end of our parade. But it wasn't anything hard enough to even think about unseating me.
There’s a lot of Southern Ontario, where exactly?
I also received these lovely flowers from Cynthia with this cute card!
Have fun
Having accepted Wittgensteinian relativism as truth, thinkers of the more courageous kind, like Steven Lukes and Donald Davidson, are tireless in their efforts to establish inter-linking strands of universal inter-cultural understanding (‘bridgeheads’) by taking the signified ‘tolerance’ itself to task and milking it for everything drop its supposed signifier-determined relativist ‘essence’ can produce by stating that, for example, the Principle of Humanity and the Principle of Charity are what ultimately binds our cocoons together. Now this is all fine and dandy, but fighting the enemy (relativism) from within, according to the rules imposed by the enemy itself, usually doesn’t stand a very good of success. And the mere fact that translators (linguists) can stand with feet in different cocoons, doesn’t help the cause either. That translators are forced to be ‘liberal/charitable’ with cocoon-caused signifiers and their cocoon-bound signified when it comes to translating from one language to another is obvious. For example, when the Noble Savage witchdoctor uses the signifier “Ooga booga” to act as linguistic representation for the sense-filled lightning strike (the burn someone ‘signified’) he just witnessed, and I, as a Westerner, use the signifier “lightning” (the seek shelter ‘signified’), then a translator would surely have a very unenviable task to fulfill in finding a strand common understanding to meaningfully link our respective insular cocoons. To Lukes’ credit though, he realizes that the mere possibility of being able to recognize belief-systems in foreign cultures (cocoons) presupposes the existence of a commonly shared set of criteria through which the truth-value of statements can be determined and whereby, subsequent, conclusions can be drawn from.
Another of my All-Time Favorite Movie Comedies.
The FEI Management is also currently studying a range of additional measures, including the use of closed circuit television for warm-up arenas at selected shows so that potential abuse accusations can be more readily identified and recorded.
1/12: 550 Foll/3 Men./Ganirelix
Ok, with the long intro out of the way, on to the show!
Today I would like to share a PDF of my first project in electronic layout and typography. The project was to design a typography specimen for a typeface. My typeface was Rockwell. We were to use images from the time period the typeface was designed as well as include all the letters, upper and lowercase, all the numbers and a 500 word essay. The front cover could only showcase one image and the name of typeface, the back cover had to have an image of the creator and an additional image as well as two paragraphs about the creator. Mr. Pierpont has no images of himself! It was also a very difficult typeface to establish a creator, because most of my research showed that Rockwell was "created at the Monotype Foundry under the direction of Frank Pierpont".
I agree. But if it did happen with some other girlfriend, the question remained why the author chose that specific break up for a stand in for his protagonist’s relationships with white women. If it didn’t happen, why the need to contrive a racially divisive narrative?
So what the Tories need to do now is to learn from Thursday and toughen up. Yes they got a mid-term thumping, but they can avoid a general election thumping next time around by reconnecting with the traditional conservative support that has turned its back on them in the past two decades. But that leads to the next problem. The Tories aren't overly blessed with potential leaders are they?
This was a DNF after I got about a quarter of the way through - the characters of Emerald, Clovis and Charlotte were just not grabbing me. They wanted to be a cross between Bright Young Things (slightly down at the heels), Cold Comfort Farm and something more quotidian, but it didn't quite work. Smudge, on the other hand, had promise, as did their home, Sterne. Perhaps if the writing hadn't tried to be quite so clever and there was more a sense of why these people, why this plot, I could have read more.
turning it back into just . . . . . .
As a novelist, I've found that one of the most positive experiences is when one's work is reviwed by someone who "gets" what you were trying to do. My first couple of books enjoyed, luckily enough, a lot of positive attention (though one review was one of the worst I've ever had.) But perhaps the best moment was reading a long review, in the New Law Journal, by Frances Fyfield, who had clearly figured out what was in my mind when producing the book, and appreciated it. I'll never forget the pleasure this gave me. Years later, I had the opportunity to say thanks in person when I finally got to meet Frances.
In other applications, though, reliance on doctrine can be restricting and dangerous. Take parenting, for example. Gathering information, ideas, and best practices helps us open our eyes and minds to all sorts of ideas we never would have thought possible, which is great. But when our choices become strictly dogmatic and unwavering, well then things get interesting.
I am terrified of snaks, so would this dress give me the heebie jeebies? Would it squeeze me tight and then swallow me whole?
STEP 12: Remove the slipcover. Measure out and mark where you want your buttons to be placed. Now do the same on the back (the MDF side) - there's a reason for this. I initially thought I could drill straight through the foam backing and go through the MDF. Nope. The foam gets wrapped around the drill and stops. So you need to mark out your placement on the back as well since that's where you'll be drilling from.
No more doors are barricaded
DIAs are very similar to so-called longevity annuities, Baker adds, except that the longevity purchase typically defers income for 20 or more years. As product development continues in this area, the industry is starting to use the term DIA for the seven-to 10-year products and longevity insurance or longevity annuities for the 20-year-and-up products, Baker notes.
...like that's ever stopped me before...
Row 9-11- Rep row 8. Finish off.
“I don’t think you can overemphasise the importance of having a good background in maths and science.
Amy Tangerine wood grain tape
Then we headed home over the fields, including crossing an interminable field of oilseed rape where the crop was as tall as I am. It was like walking through the bristles of a broom, although, at ground level, the path was perfectly clear.
An amateur video posted online by activists in Rastan showed a group of alleged army defectors in military uniforms saluting crowds calling for the regime’s downfall from a balcony.
Yesterday, we wandered along the river and spent the day in the renovated old quarter which is very beautiful – otherwise the architecture is quite modern. We saw many huge barges pass along the River Maine, including state-of-the art river cruise ships.
Here is one of the ways that we chill out...
Digital love sounds awful. A bunch of ones and zeros on a wafer of silicon won't get anyone's heart racing, let alone inspire them to write a song or pen poetry. However, those ones and zeros are canny things; they understand that they're neither warm nor sexy, so they present us with a more lovable facade. The photo above, for instance. Or blogs. Or iTunes. Somewhere along the line, the digital gods found themselves a first-rate PR firm, and followed its advice.
that Atlantic Yards is not considered a priority by these agencies at this time.
GC: What was it like working alongside actor Stephen Lang, and with director Ron Maxwell?
Raisins (until it looks good!)
And common natures feel the wide uplift,
I kinda of like showing pics like this. They are not impressive but kinda shows how much work goes into a map.
Mary and the other women would not have been able to grab onto Jesus and cling to Him if it had not been a bodily resurrection!
Here are some of the blogs that I visit regularly and that I think you guys would enjoy:
Melt the chocolate chips in a double boiler or microwave, according to the package instructions for melting. Using a skewer, a mini spatula, a spoon—whatever works—roll or dip the balls in the melted chocolate and place on the wax paper. You may have to patch up the sides with melted chocolate (this is where the mini spatula comes in handy) if the candies come out a little rough. If you’ve got any fingers free from melted chocolate, sprinkle a pinch of Kosher or sea salt on top. Place in the refrigerator or freezer for a little while to set up.
I kind of like it here in the last stall in the men’s room on the 14th floor. I wear headphones to block out extra noises, I have access to all the meeting rooms if I need to meet with anyone, the break room is right next door with a fridge and vending machines, no one bothers me at my desk so that’s a big plus right there. Also, the never-ending monthly reorganizations and cubicle shuffles never affect me since no one knows where my ‘office’ really is anyway. Except for you. If you need me, you’ll usually find me at my desk, or cubicle, stall. There are three; mine is the last one. The door will be closed and the indicator will say ‘occupied’, but it’s just me.
(Click to enlarge – extract of new property added in the second edition of NAMA’s Enforcement List published today)
I thinks it that time again where I do my little shout out to all the wonderful bloggers and commenters who are "No Reply". I've noticed hundreds lately on my blog.
In the United States, Cuban officials aren’t allowed to travel more than 25 miles from their bases in Washington or at the United Nations in New York without prior approval. U.S. officials in Havana are banned from leaving the city, and can meet only with Cuban Foreign Ministry officials.
Fresh lemon juice to prevent avocado from browning
so I had to take my drivers license to a police station to be sent away
(Widescreen, Subtitles, Dolby Digital 5.1, Audio Described, 5 Star)
She was right. Writing won’t pay for the feed bill on our farm, and nurses are in demand. So I keep my license up to date no matter what. But I digress. . . except let me say one more thing: writers write because they love words. Blogging is writing with the addition of photography—two creative and complimentary processes.
I love it even more when I can take those leftovers and make it even better. That's what I did tonight! Are you ready for this? I made one of my favorite southern dishes from the leftover BBQ pork dish I made the other day and the left over chicken from last nights Publix Chicken Dinner.
I regret not believing in myself.
Once I had completed both of these I had a crack at writing another VSV, this time about the Townsville Enterprise Business Industry Breakfast. To be completely honest, while I was completely thrilled to be writing my fifth story of the day it was quite a stretch on my writing abilities considering I haven’t been an intern long! After struggling a bit to figure out how to write it (“sharp, short and simple” was the advice I was given after being asked how I was going and saying I’d rewritten the story three times) I got there in the end and again required a fair bit of editing. A challenging two days but I can definitely say I learn a lot and came out relatively unscathed.
Do you have your right hand on a mouse or a touchpad?
3. Gallop poll suggests America is gradually moving towards accepting evolution – When it comes to accepting evolution, America is somewhat of an embarrassment to the rest of the world. In recent years, polls have shown that up to 47% of Americans are Young Earth Creationists. But a new poll suggests that number is now only 40%. Still not anything remotely to be proud of but it suggests that maybe our efforts to take on the creationists may be yielding positive results.
You showed me things I’d never seen before
Anyway, to the point. After the first workshop, I had told a fellow author (let's call him John) about the experience. So, when I turned up in the Yurt before the next one, I breezily said to John, "So, that's me ready for the tartan loony!" He looked at me, horror writ large on his face. The horror stayed there for several seconds. Then realisation and relief dawned. "Oh, you mean your workshop guy? I thought you meant ..."
I’ll tell you who we’re sponsoring and where to send your dollar. You’ll need a paypal account to play. If you don’t have a Paypal account, you just need one. It’s time. So go ahead and set one up and meet me back here. I’ll link a button to the Paypal account that we’ll be blasting. Then once you’ve donated your dollar spread the word to get some more dollars in here. If you have a voice, an email account, a blog, a facebook page, a twitter account or a pinboard USE IT! The only way we can make a big difference is to make it viral!
“Hey you know what you are?”
Cara, meanwhile, discovers that her company hasn’t budgeted for bringing both of its employees home. She’s been cleared to go, but her new friend has not. If she keeps her mouth shut, she knows she’ll see Earth again, but her conscience screams for her to risk abandonment to save his life. Her predicament could become moot, though: Felix has triggered a surprise visit from Koyamatsu, which threatens to aggressively smooth any embarrassing wrinkles in the operation.
Raised in nobility, Kard was born the first son of Sir Larnedhel Thoronarth, brother to Duke Inglaroch. He always felt more at home in the words surrounding his ancestral tower – hunting game to provide the other Noble houses with the delicacies they so crave and learning the beginnings of tracking and archery. Taught to be extremely ruthless from a young age, Kard grew up with very few friends spending the majority of his time alone. After a mysterious falling out with his father Kard decided to join the Royal Guard, to better use his skills to protect the crumbling Mener dynasty. Years spent training in woodcraft have made him agile and cunning, using these attributes to better serve the Royal House. His noble background has lent him a strong base in the beginnings of reading and writing. His strong sense of honour and justice is what lead him to join the Guard, and his very fast reflexes have saved him on many occasions. The Guard have taught him to be a novice at spotting and he’s put this to good use in his time among them.
But the band did come close to a break through.
Later, government agents escort Klaatu to see Barnhardt, who has seen the correction to his work as a calling card which could not have been faked. Klaatu warns the professor that the people of the other planets are concerned for their safety because human beings have developed atomic power. Barnhardt offers Klaatu the opportunity to speak at an upcoming meeting of scientists he is organizing at the spaceship; Klaatu accepts. Barnhardt is stunned when Klaatu declares that, if his message is rejected by Earth's leaders, "Planet Earth will be eliminated". The professor pleads for Klaatu to first provide a minor demonstration of his power as a warning. Klaatu returns to his spaceship the next evening to implement the professor's suggestion, unaware Bobby watched him enter the ship. He tells Helen and Tom what he has seen when they return from an evening out – Helen notices her son's shoes are soaking wet, while Tom finds a diamond – the currency of Klaatu's people – in Carpenter's room. Tom takes the diamond to three separate jewelers the following day, who all note they have never seen anything like it. When Bobby tells him what he saw, Klaatu meets Helen at work to clarify his intent. While riding in an elevator, it stops. A montage sequence shows that Klaatu has suppressed electric power all over the world – with the exception of critical systems such as hospitals and planes in flight. After the blackout, the authorities step up their manhunt for Klaatu, quarantining the city so no one can enter or leave.
The offer lasts until December 7th (now extended to December 10th FB)
Momma P's Chicken Soup
(I just want to know where they are!)
I will not get into the flight. Anybody who's flown internationally on any airline knows what it's like. Everybody else just couldn't understand.
Papi and I jumped, and The Golden moved as far away as possible. He was already on the other side of the deck, so there wasn't really anywhere else to go, however, he made himself as small as he could.
To say more would give away too much.
I think the major technique I would tell any aspiring 10-man shaman is that you can’t be afraid of OOM’ing. Shamans are a class that’s all about throwing the whole kitchen sink at a problem. Totems, unleash elements, nature’s swiftness. GHW. Riptide.
To help another human being reach one’s celestial potential is part of the divine mission of woman. As mother, teacher, or nurturing saint, she molds living clay to the shape of her hopes. In partnership with God, her divine mission is to help spirits live and souls be lifted. This is the measure of her creation. It is ennobling, edifying, and exalting.
Worse, of course, is that same feeling before a deployment. It’s similar, but it starts earlier. Instead of the hours before the end of the weekend, it starts weeks earlier and only intensifies as the day gets closer. Moments are magnified and take on unnatural significance. There’s a sudden urge to be sentimental.
Other Books We Read & Recommend:
He can go to Human Resources and try to convince them it would help or the bills will mount up on my visits for asthma, High Blood pressure, and diabetes. But...there is always a but...he is not an aggressive person. He will not go and try to talk them into anything. So I will have to walk this path in my own way.
Tackling the shortcomings of the extensive growth model, which focuses on exploiting natural resources, exporting raw agro-products and depends hugely on foreign loans, is another important task. The Government will also do all what it could to cultivate a level playing field for all firms, including small and medium enterprises, to boost economic development and improve social equity at the same time. Resources should be allocated according to productivity, efficiency and contribution to the production chain as the most efficacious factors of production will provide the strongest pillar of growth.
Building on the traditional week-long immersions in Improv, Comedy Writing, and Acting held each summer, The Second City Training Center is piloting a new course titled ‘Writing GLBT Comedy’, set to run June 25-29. Students will explore comedy where ‘gay’ is the given, not the punchline. They will discover their comedic point of view while creating memorable characters, scenes and songs that go beyond easy stereotypes.
Furthermore, significant number of sources has also claimed that it was entirely possible for a Hawaiian certification of live birth to be issued to someone who in fact was not born in that state. I have no idea whether this is true but these claims have never been satisfactorily refuted or tested in court. The believing media have not even challenged this assertion, but have, for their own reasons, chosen to ignore it.
Here's how you make it:
4And if anyone goes in flight to one of those towns, and comes into the public place of the town, and puts his cause before the responsible men of the town, they will take him into the town and give him a place among them where he may be safe.
Let go of the fear.
Also, publishing a novel typically takes forever. The industry moves like molasses, so if you’re taking the traditional publishing route you need to be prepared for the long haul. Patience is a virtue here. If you don’t have it, get it, because you’re definitely going to need it.
Midnight in Paris by Woody Allen
1/2 can responsibly sourced tuna in brine
The last four or five decades have seen extraordinary economic and population growth in the southern states of the United States, continuing historic developments that started during the Second World War and were later stimulated by the end of legal racial segregation. One national effect of those changes has been a continual shift in the center of economic growth for the whole country to the southern and western states, away from the Northeast and the Midwest “rust belt.”
It seems, too, that no matter how many kids you add, experience doesn't count for a whole lot. They each present new challenges and experiences that you never encountered before. And just when you think you might finally make it through the wild jungle of child-rearing, you face that inexplicable new animal: the adult child.
So new that their eyes are closed and their skin translucent.
When I first started putting the book together, I planned to include a quote to go with each photograph, like Hand-me-downs but without the stories. In the end, I decided to keep the quotes/life philosophies, but include them at the end in one complete list, rather than distract from the local images.
Well, if you call exploring the new Ikea over at Red Hook:
Wounded people with extensive burns crowded a hospital in Kunduz, the capital of the northern province which lies on a main supply line for the more than 100,000 foreign troops based in Afghanistan, an AFP reporter said.
For too long our minds have been chained by fear, by division, by impotence. The one thing the elite fear most is a great awakening. That day is here. Together we can seize it.
Winslow Schalkwyk
Cold Mountain Song
BrewDog Hardcore IPA
Then will you let me past your face to see what's really you?
Critics of the Obama administration have been quick to seize on this as the real reason for the falling unemployment rate. In February, the Republican National Committee released a research note on “The Missing Worker,” arguing that “over 3 million unemployed workers have called it quits due to Obamanomics.”
I apologize for the poor shots, these were shot just before the cake was butchered by 20 people, talking about being under pressure.
I expect to be done with the first two by Thursday and the second two by Saturday. What are you reading?
Picture who hailed from Holland play an excellent catchy style of metal similiar to early Iron Maiden and Judas Priest to my ear , however I've also seen the Saxon comparison thrown around elsewhere on the web.
Although Moscow handed me plenty of victories, defeats and draws those two weeks, the trip began inauspiciously. On day two, my husband Hal and I took the metro to Izmailovsky Park, a massive flea-market in the city’s outskirts. I hesitantly threaded my way through the stalls of sub-par bags and sneakers, pausing, out of timid politeness, to try on a jacket a hawker pressed towards me. Suddenly, a throng of swarthy, overeager leather salesmen assailed me, pulling and grasping at my arms, barking at me to try their wares. Perfectly innocent though it was, the scene awakened some dark, reasonless old terror in me. My husband Hal saw my panic, knew why it might tend to arise disproportionately to the situation, and extracted me. I retreated to the hotel, feeling thoroughly overwhelmed.
I started going to the indoor toddler gym times at the local community center. A new playground had just been built there, so we could stay outside if the weather permitted. This was promising! I ante’ed up the $2 for us to go inside and no one was in there. I wasn’t socializing but I quickly discovered that the bouncy castle could hold my postpartum weight. $12 later, I met a plucky energetic mom Liz whose son was a few months younger than my daughter. We laughed at our kids rolling around on the mats and had an immediate rapport. I was a little hesitant to make the first move and before I knew it, she had packed up and left with her son. A few minutes later, she came running back in and was missing her phone. I offered her my phone to call hers and we found it sitting in the Radio Flyer wagon. She had my number, called my phone right back, and said “Now you have mine.” B-bam! I was back in the saddle again. (And Liz and I have weathered many ups and downs of parenting together since.)
Until then, thanks for the memories and the ultra rockness, but I’d rather jam a rusty screw driver up my urethra.
-Make a paste using the corn flour and all purpose flour not very thin.
she said she would like her dress to be yellow... and so I pulled out some paper and tried a few different pieces against her.. she chose the first one... I kept flicking through... and yes the first one WAS the best... should have seen that coming!!!
And then.
This happened at a Philcon, back in the day. The hotel had a surprisingly large restaurant and a wandering accordion player who roved from table to table, playing snatches of music while people tried to to avoid eye contact. This was back when Cyberpunk roamed the earth and science fiction had some claim to being cool, remember. And no amount of Postmodern irony could make accordions cool.
So, let me talk about Network Ethics a bit. In my nearly complete manifesto book, an entire third of the text is devoted to network ethics. And within network ethics, there is only one standard of value: complexity. This value is designed as something which applies to human, living, and non-living systems. Here’s a quickie version of why.
I'm adding these two treats to the list for the next time the rangpur lime fairy strikes:
The long answer:
Haggai 1:2
Yes, the Fillmores installed the first library in the White House — though it was more out of their love of books than a lack of a Bible. And they updated the kitchen, but certainly someone had some sort of stove to cook on prior to 1850.
Luzinski broke out for the Phillies in 1973, but had injury issues in 1974 as he played in just 85 games. He bounced back big-time in 1975, driving in 120 runs and finishing second in the National League MVP voting. He finished second again in 1977.
The report’s executive summary concludes, “It is clear that the textbooks examined throughout this report contain extensive amounts of material that is seriously historically flawed and often unmistakably biased.”
500g braising beef, cut into big pieces
...then a very long day helping out with my church on Sunday...
So, why? I think this has something to do with keeping people involved in the conversation by requiring their participation. “A parable is not an explanation. A parable is not an illustration. We cannot look at a parable as a spectator and expect to get it. A parable does not make a thing easier; it makes it harder by requiring participation, by entering the story…” (59-60).
When asked to a white person, this question is met with confusion. But for me, it’s an inquiry about my race. No one had to tell me, even as a child, that “What are you?” meant “What race are you?” I just knew. My answer used to be, “I’m mixed,” which would raise other questions about what I was mixed with and how much of it. “Mixed” was never a good enough answer.
Mark "Chopper" Read suggested that Eric Bana play Chopper, after seeing him in the sketch comedy series "Full Frontal".
"We're used to playing to the same crowd in Reykjavik, so we're really looking forward to coming to Canada and sweating on your stage."
I was so exhausted that in between contractions I couldn't hold my head up.
Russian River Brewing Co
Hopefully Peyton Manning stays healthy, because the AFC West division will be competitive. After the schedule release and with the draft coming up in a week, the NFL continues to steal headlines from other sports (NHL playoffs, MLB season just started). This will be another exciting football season as we impatiently anticipate week one!
I find myself proof-reading everything these days-books I read, my kids homework, my husband's emails...I can forgive typos, but I had to nicely point out to my daughter that: "Joe said, "Who is that? She's super cute," he thought," just doesn't cut it...which is exactly what she needed to do-cut one of them, and before posting it online. :) I'm hoping she went with thought.
Just another strange day in the Wise household.
Through enhanced listening to the harmonic tones of traditional tibetan and crystal singing bowls; you will have an opportunity to open the seven charism centers contained within your physical and spiritual body. Each center, or chakra, reveals a gift that will deepen your understanding and relationship with Soul.
FPA is the organisation that makes sexual health a priority public health issue in the UK. There vision is of a country where talking sense about sex is the norm not the exception. They also educate and inform thousands of people about sexual health each year and campaign to improve sexual health services. Calls are confidential and the UK helpline is a member of the Helplines Association. Call 0845 122 8690 9am to 5pm Monday to Friday.
Sister papers City Press and Rapport reported on Sunday that seven of Mdluli's relatives had been appointed as CIU agents and were paid from the secret funds.
I can take it all
Now here in this next scene, an innocent tourist dressed in his t-shirt and bermudas was in the vicinity, and our PDRM thugs punched and kicked this innocent tourist. “Ta Kwai Lo” – they hit the white men.. is what this videographer said.
Row 17- (sc in 2, 2sc, sc in 3, 2sc) around (54)
fill the pockets of peasants and come home
The Solar Grand Minima Preparedness Plan focuses on threats present in a Little Ice Age. Mankind has been down this road before and we will go down this road again and we will survive. The last time we faced the threat from a solar Grand Minima was over 300 years ago, and as a result it has almost been erased from our collective memory. A solar Grand Minima produces a time of great hardship, a time of significant natural global cooling, a time of great famine and starvation and a time of major epidemics.
Genuine, but not of themselves particularly significant, distinctions amongst products are subsumed in a construction and reinforcing of ideology.
- In Lebanon men are allowed to have sex with any other animal just as long as it is a female. If a man is caught having sex with a male animal then the penalty is death.
We live in a darling part of Atlanta called Brookhaven. We are super close to everything (like great shopping and restaurants) and mama never has to get on the interstate! She can get to Lenox Mall or work in about 10 minutes! It's also super close to a great park and the City Dog Market which is amazing!!
Finish: There is a full bodied finish that is amusing from a lager.
5. You walk out of the store and notice that across the street is "the Tubby Olive"...an olive oil store (I have nothing else to say about this...)
Feel free to watch it in its entirety, but what I wanted to point out from it was that in her angry vent, the wife expresses dismay towards the “other woman”, to which Judge Judy replies that she owes her nothing. That she isn’t the one who broke their marriage contract, and that she best take a closer look at her husband, instead of placing the blame on the mistress. I can see both viewpoints, but I disagree entirely on this position of letting the mistress whore off scott-free. If this were a sandbox scuffle, mama bear would have come in and punished both, no?
that you will meet someone and never give up on happiness,
So with that said my hair is up in a messy bun. I look like I just rolled out of bed which led me to looking up amazing hair pics. and being jealous. again..cray cray.
Spurs have 4 games remaining, and of course, they are two back-to-backs with a day of rest in between: Home games vs. Cleveland & Portland Sunday & Monday, followed by road games at Phoenix & Golden State. Yeah we can still win 50 - in a season with 16 fewer games than usual.
Sing a new song to the Lord,
Well back in reality i thougth at least i should make Gina proud and dress like she would, with a fullskirted dress and accentuating the waist, i mean girls if you have a waist don´t waste it and let it everybody see!
Anyway, I was shocked that companies bother to have two different formulas because to me that seems expensive but when asked why they did that instead of selling the safer formula in both places...it was stated in one of the books - "Because they can." Basically, American women will still buy the formula that is not safe. And yes ladies, we do want the latest and greatest on what is going to make us thinner, younger, prettier, perfect skin, etc. but at what cost, eventually? I would like to change that - the more information I put on there a long with many others will hopefully cause a few women to buy the safer alternatives and make these companies that have bad ingredients realize we are no longer going to allow them to essentially ruin our health!
The Ontario government offers first timers like us the opportunity to do an overnight in a provincial park “without hassles or worries.” (Their words, not mine…and yes, I’m skeptical).
Beat egg whites and sugar to stiff peaks, add the fermented dough and continue to achieve a homogenous mixture. Proof until batter doubles in volume. Steam in porcelain tea cups over high heat for 12 mins.
Sunday morning we packed up and then went hiking. We drove back to an area Athletica had seen the day before on her run. We hiked up to the top of this butte following Dow Trail which consisted of many switchbacks. We were breathing like we were oxygen deprived due to the altitude. We stopped to take a few pictures and felt a bit light-headed. Best to stay away from the edge which was fairly sheer and dotted with cactus. Ouch! We made it to the top of the butte which also contained a very sheer drop and sat to have a snack, avoiding getting too close to the edge. It was such a wonderful day for a hike. The sun warmed everything quite nicely and there was a gentle breeze blowing. It was so incredibly quiet.
Reading: Code Name Verity by Elizabeth Wein (starting point p. 206)
The things I remember not so fondly? Waiting 30 minutes for a takeaway coffee at the SLQ’s cafe (though it wasn’t my coffee so I was perhaps less impatient than if it actually was mine I was waiting for), everything about that first panel I attended, and the addition of the bloody bridge that almost made me late for a panel that, in hindsight, I wouldn’t have minded missing in the least.
· Personal driving 17%
That may be, but we're the ones who keep buying. Not just because Augie asks, but because they are so amazingly fun for both him and us. Seriously. I have my eye on a ginormous R2-D2 that comes out this week. They didn't even have to advertise me up; I saw it on a friend's Facebook page.
My perfect love
Dear Friends: I have now had the opportunity to review my information sources. I have already sent to you the basic thrust of my analysis: Namely, that the Japanese Nuclear Power Industry constitutes a Crime against Humanity as defined by Article 7 of the Rome Statute for the International Criminal Court, to which Japan is a party. The same holds true for the Nuclear Power Industries in all the other countries of the World. You have the text of Rome Statute Article 7 below, which is directly on point...(-more)
I have to say that this is a bit embarrassing to admit to you all. It can be quite intimidating being amongst all of you great design bloggers out there. You all know who you are... Your talent is awe inspiring and I really just watch you all from the sidelines while living in my sad little apartment. And to those of you who I've met and have never invited over, well now you know the reason why....
Scenario.
Annabella Apart from your immediate family, who or what has been the greatest creative inspiration in your life and why?
are welcomed from any area, profession and/or
And, in return, I got tons of comments about how J & I are traveling fools,
I looked at my husbands face, a man who NEVER show emotion, and I knew his heart was breaking. He held L and squeezed her tight; he laughed when he asked for a kiss and she puckered up and planted one on him. He hugged G and told he would be home soon and he was sorry he had to go. He told both kids he loved them and to stand at the window and he would wave to them as he drove out. We hugged and he said “Why do they have to make it so hard? I miss you guys already.” All I could do was squeeze him tighter and try to hide my tears.
Clues: Droopy stems, weird buds, and few unusually skinny leaves
Sketch Archives: You can now find all of the past Waltzingmouse Stamp sketches all in one place for those times when you want to jump-start your creativity anytime you are stumped. Take a peek right HERE. It’s a wonderful source of inspiration.
On the first day we didn’t see a single zebra, didn’t even so much as catch a whiff of a zebra, never mind encountering vast herds of the beasts. On the second day, determined to find zebras, we trundled northwards to the savanna plains of the Kruger National Park. We drove up to a viewing point and gazed down.
But Tiffany is actually known more for very simple diamond engagement ring settings introduced in 1886.
I enjoyed the mini-story we had here tonight with the Fatal 4-way, and it surely put all four men in position they can win. My only complaint though is we didn’t hear much from Alberto Del Rio. Remember, he is supposed to be angry that his title match isn’t a one on one encounter. Maybe it’s a little thing, but we just didn’t hear from him, nor was he booked to look strong. Next week, that has to change. Give him the upper hand here, instead he was a door mat for all three opponents.
I think it's quite unique to Scotland. The Scottish have a bit of a reputation for on one hand for having a sweet tooth and on the other, deep frying everything from pizza (no joke - dipped in batter and deep fried !) to mars bars.
Representative to show you what to do
I've never been called for a survey...until a few minutes ago.
With similar frustration, Dave has been looking for an apartment to rent in Paris. Not just for a week, but a year long contract. He found one he really wants. But the agent just can't be bothered. He calls her, leaves messages, has gone to the office, gotten promises from her that she will call him back and again, NOTHING.
1/2 C (1 stick) butter, softened
Videos from Alter Video Magazine
I create this new statement reluctantly. But I hate to admit, it makes me feel better…hopeful. Hopeful that maybe at some point, I can let the bad stuff go…
Where a trickle floods as a tidal wave
The article mentioned that the projected population size for 2050 will be 9 billion people. I’m in agreement that people should consider having fewer kids. However, since the journalists took it upon them to decide which people should consider having fewer children I’m also going to have a shot at making the same decision!
There's that great iconic image of the Whitehouse being obliterated and grand scenes of carnage in the streets. A counter-strike is put together and Will Smith and Jeff Goldblum are employed to save the world. These being the early days of Will Smith's acting career, where he still rapped and nobody trusted him to save the world without a grumpy white man by his side. Meanwhile, Randy Quaid goes a little crazy and even President Bill Pullman lends a hand.
Chest: 42”- down ¼”
B) Make Some Noise
So, if the Queen is happy to sit up there in Buckingham Palace, or any other of her state-financed homes, and totally disregard the plight of her people – what use is she?
I spent Saturday night, my last night in Austin, at The Austin Moose Lodge.
The kids left most of their candy for the EB to take. In return he left baskets filled with fun. Summer's eggs were hidden in her room. Garrett, on the other hand, got to follow a trail of clues hidden in eggs. The trail lead, eventually, to "Alvin and the Chipmunks: Chipwrecked" for he and Summer to share. The EB is very clever and Garrett had a BLAST following the clues.
Added to the fourteen previously published short stories, is a bonus story – THE RISING OF LEN MUNCH – soon to be published in RADGEPACKET VOL. 6 under the title SHADOWS IN THE RAIN. Out of the fourteen other stories, SMALL PRINT is in this years MAMMOTH BOOK OF BEST BRITISH CRIME, alongside such luminaries as Mark Billingham, Val McDirmid, Ken Bruen, and Peter James, as wells as my old muckers Col Bury, Nick Quantrill, and, or course, our Nigel here, and there is also SURF RIDER – a story that has been longlisted for one of this year's Derringer Awards.
"I can't cry, even if I want to!"
The Kabuto is all about keeping things simple and getting it done without breaking the bank. At the heart of the Kabuto you’ll find a strong hand crafted steel frame with horizontal dropouts that can handle the abuse of the big city. City riders told us that they didn’t need derailleurs so we listened and outfitted the Kabuto with a flip flop hub so you can run it as a fixed gear or in standard freewheel single speed mode without having to worry abou… Read More >>
The DA’s stance was emboldened by the objections about the bill raised by a vast number of civil bodies, media institutions and members of the public arguing that the legislation infringed on the rights of individuals, posed a threat to media freedom and undermined the fight against corruption.
Ochs und Junior Due Ore Tinta and Mesa Tinta- choose your own color of dial: "Ochs und Junior just launched a pilot series of these ‘Tinta’ models and they are ready and available for immediate delivery. However… just one watch per colour is the pilot series! Even the straps can be colored, so this is customization to the max."
Lately, she had been going on and on about how desperately she wanted to be able to go across the monkey bars but her fear always got the better of her. My husband and I took her over to the school over the weekend and tried to work with her to overcome her fear. Her Papa patiently held her legs and keep assuring her that he would not let her go....to no avail....she was terrified. After about a half hour, I just told her that this was not something that she had to do. It would be much better to play on all of the other equipment that she enjoyed and just wait until she was not so frightened to get on the monkey bars. She agreed!
Posted byJ. R. Guinness at
1195 D-X/7(A)/1994. “Michael O’Kiersey (1908-1994).” Prelude, First Friday Lecture, The Basic Program, The University of Chicago, The Cultural Center, Chicago Public Library, Chicago, Illinois.
most of the time lately, i seem to just spill my words all over this blog. they're written distractedly and without intention, and i honestly think more about how loud each letter sounds as i punch it out rather than the words i'm making and the sentences i'm building. my texts have more substance.
How tall are you?
Quiet time with a little one in tow is quite different.
similar product is available anywhere in the world.
They were waiting for me when I got home from work yesterday - propped precariously against the front door. A birthday gift for Kidlet - or so I thought. The note taped to the plastic sleeve was addressed to me so I carefully peeled back the tape, released the bouquet from its wrapper, and opened the card. It confirmed that the flowers weren't for Kidlet -- they were from Kidlet.
Now that my long runs are getting longer, I’m playing around with what works for fueling and what doesn’t. Today I had a gel (ClifShot) at 50:00 and then another one at 1:40:00 and just drank water. Seemed to work alright. I’m lucky in that my stomach isn’t very sensitive and isn’t picky (so far) about gels vs. solid food vs. liquid.
There are many more issues I could delve into. I could talk about the fact that Phil has outlived the average groundhog by 100+ years or the fact that Phil is only right 39% of the time. That seems like nitpicking, though. I’m sure one of the first signs of insanity is criticizing a rodent’s scientific abilities, so I’ll let it slide by.
After the supper, everyone has gone for sleep but Mahek and Pratyush are still awake.
On 29 April 2011, an anonymous commentator asked me to explore the website http://jewishturnaround.com, and to express my opinions thereon. The posting in question is JEWISH TURNAROUND - CHRISTIAN RESPONSE.
We also went on a field trip to the post office. We actually did this a few weeks ago, but couldn't blog about it until now because I didn't want to give my grandparents a chance to read their letters before they had a chance to open them! :)
for three months before I learned that we have a bigger house, too!
Resting on top of a rock pillar that was split apart from the rest
Ska is brewing about 900 barrels of Mexican Logger this summer, double last year's production, and distributing it to all of the brewery's markets.
No matter what size or shape we are, if we fit – He ships, we’re on our way! Jesus chose us with our own unique packaging. He holds us together and what He says; sticks! We are Signed, Sealed and Delivered (Stevie Wonder). Sign up with The Lord! We are Sealed in His Blood and Delivered from sin. Once we accept the Lord, we are Signed up in the Book of Life, Sealed in His blood and Delivered for all eternity!
It kind of makes sense. I'm not all that interested in capturing fleeting effects of light on color, which is one of the main goals of a plain air painter. I'm not compelled to paint something just because the colors are unusually beautiful. For example, the fall colors of deciduous trees, or blooming flowers in the spring, while making me go Ooh ash~ , doesn't make me want to paint them. When I realized that I'm in the minority among my artist friends in that I'm not moved to paint by the colors I see, I thought, "huh, this must be a piece of my identity puzzle."
Last Friday, the Supreme Court stopped the Bureau of Internal Revenue from imposing a 12 percent value-added tax on toll rates. The Professional Heckler tried to get Malacañang’s side on the issue but spokesman Edwin Lacierda was reportedly busy… blaming the Arroyo government.
Today I get to go see my eye doctor, making Monday even less pleasant. I seem to have accquired an eye infection and haven't worn my contacts in days. So now not only will have to get medicine, but I'll have to get more contacts too. This comes just after I've had a sick doggie and a sick air conditioner. Oh, and last night it seemed like the air was starting to go out again.
Lack is listed as a verb and a noun on the Merriam-Webster online Dictionary. As a verb it means to be deficient or missing, or to have need of something. The definitions that really spoke to me were the ones given for the noun "lack" in the thesaurus at the same website: "the fact or state of being absent", "a falling short of an essential or desirable amount" or " a state of being without something necessary, desirable, or useful."
“I think…I think they kill something during an abortion.”
As far as I know, the University of Texas has not commented on this, though I expect them too shortly. I am a UT grad, and this was the first Google search I did. You could as easily Google "Michigan can koozie" and find one to buy and slip over your silver Bud Light can.
Following is The CW’s midseason premiere and finale schedule:
So THAT sent us to the internet to look at other musical options.
By no means was this an easy thing to do. Not by a long shot. But it's incredibly useful. Because a manuscript or a query, no matter how flawed, always looks perfect when viewed in the warm, flickering candle-light of delusion. Only in the harsh, flourescent light of rejection do the flaws become obvious.
Our bedroom is on my list of rooms in our house that I'd really like to revamp. We brought to our new home the furniture we had in our old townhouse and it doesn't reflect the look I'd like to achieve, so some changes are in order.
Metro Ahad and Sin Chew top the league table in nett average sales.
The only way out for Dalglish is for him to resign. The board are rather new and are hit and miss with the fans and sacking a club legend would drive them out of Liverpool ( if their wheels haven’t already been nicked).
Another note, my kitchenware for Passover is rather collegiate – most pieces are from a cheap set from Target. I just wanted to point that out because if anyone reads my blog and wonders how to cook without fancy equipment (which I do have year round), it is definitely possible. I also have to hand wash everything, which makes it challenging for the cleanup process, so I completely empathize with those who don’t have a dish washer.
Author: Claire Freedman
I am toying with making chocolate or something sweet as well and maybe coasters….. see what I mean with gifting. I could really make everything our guest come in contact with a gift.
As Christmas approached this year, I must admit, I was not looking forward to it as I usually do. In the past, I have always loved everything remotely connected with Christmas. I love celebrating the birth of Christ, decorations, putting up the trees, shopping, eating, drinking egg nog, Christmas music, driving around to see lights and even wrapping presents. I did a few of those things, but others, I let go by.
Dinner w/ the Mundys - September 26
The family told the curators at the Museum that their grandfather, Sargent Clarence Northover of Halifax police, had been responsible for guarding the bodies recovered after the Titanic disaster.
Time to update your Race to 10 results if you have not doneso in the past few days! Miss Haneefa...if you are still out there reading...I just saw your entry today (sorry for missing it) and have added you to the lineup. If anyone else wants to join, please do so! Remember that the Race To 10 is a FAT loss contest, not weight loss. We want to lose fat.....not lean....! For more details on how it works and how to participate visit this post: Race To 10 Details
This week Cynthia Stiverson give us some doctor's orders -- from Dr. Suess. Mary DeMuth talks sex before marriage. And Dorothy Love chooses hope.
Essence Liquid Ink eyeliner
Director: Robert Stevenson
Jolly Holiday - DSP
Align your box post using a two-way post level. Remount the box. Add shims as necessary to level the box in the horizontal and vertical planes.
:: I attached 2 rows of doodle yarn to the back of the collar as well as to each of the 2 cuffs, & 6 rows to the bottom of the jacket (I went up as far I could until I hit the pockets, but I think it would look cool if it had even more rows)
Starting with Kanon Nakagawa (above), here’s the other girls that he’s conquered as well as the ones that are sure to come soon. Note: These were all screen caps from the episode.
Anyway, the day we were driving back and forth was roasting. It was one of those windows down and elbows out the window days, or at least it would be if you weren't likely to have said elbow chopped off by an overtaking truck on the M8...
When doing a custom blend it is interesting how the blend develops over a couple of days. I start with a base scent and then pick one additional scent to blend it with. I blend them together at a couple of different ratios and then let them set for 48-72 hours before smelling them and deciding how I like them. On occasion I will blend 3-4 different scents to get the profile that I am looking for.
They’re too materialistic. That’s the problem with young people today.
I'm baackk!!!! And it feels good. Well, okay, I'm almost back. The MIL leaves tomorrow--don't get me wrong, it's okay that she's here, she's invited, she's not an imposition....but sometimes you just want your houseguests gone so you can not worry about being 'on' all the time. Also, I'm dealing with one last little wedding clean up issue and then I can work on running around planning our trip to Florida next month (and hopefully another one in January).
The most precious gift given to you in these times is LIFE.
Five TV movies I liked (no order): Marwencol, Mildred Pierce, Temple Grandin, You Don’t Know Jack and (in particular) Public Speaking.
Foer and Walsh reminded me of a conversation I had with my best friend Julie a few months back. I was troubled that yet another person had called me exhausting. This time it was, “We could never date because you’re too exhausting.” Another time it was, “You’re hard to love, you’re so exhausting.” And so on. I’m exhausting because I’m hungry, because I crave too much from life and conversations and communities. Because I won’t accept the world’s terms and instead I’ll challenge them. I’m exhausting because I push everyone and myself and the world to be more than it is, better than it is.
My doctor went right into doctor mode, and told us exactly what he wanted us to do next, to get, what he honestly believes, is the best possible care for me, his patient. He told us that I should have a D & E. If you don’t know what that is, let’s just say it’s a highly destructive procedure that is generally used in abortions occurring after the first trimester. He told us the name of the location where he wanted us to have this procedure done and that is when I started to cry. The name alone made my stomach turn and the hairs on the back of my neck stand on end. I knew beyond a doubt that he was sending me to an abortion clinic. I told him as much and while he agreed that yes, that is where a lot of their business comes from, they are the best at it (go figure) and that they would give me the best care possible. I cried some more when I thought of how a place like that would treat my child: not as a person, but as medical waste. I trust this man (and have trusted him for five years at this point, and still trust him) to care for me and I know he means well, but in this instance, I would not be following his advice. I would choose something better, for me, and most importantly for my child.
Rightly did the great theologian of the 20th century, Karl Barth, state that our “full and perfect salvation consists in this subordination to Him, and in this subordination is the co-ordination with its fellow creatures which is ordained by Him.” Let us humble ourselves before the Word of God that we might live.
Asado:
The Third Doctor, Jo Grant and UNIT become involved in a green movement – in more ways than one – in a Welsh mining village. Giant maggots, toxic chemical waste, an insane super computer, a rather tasty fungus, and angry Welshmen – 1973's THE GREEN DEATH takes its turn under the microscope in THE FACT OF FICTION.
surrounded by books and an appreciative audience.
Yep, I am back. Back from months of sporadic posts. Back from the crazy hectic roller coaster ride called life. 2011 has been a crazy crazy ride. A ride I am happy to step off of and move on from. Unfortunately, this ride has had more downs than ups. But, I hope all of that changes....2011 has four more months left (how did THAT happen??) and I am ready to make all of them good!
2. The ability to get cooperation in doing what is necessary.
Veggies
Next to the tomb are the crypts of unknowns from World War II, Korea and Vietnam. Those three graves are marked with white marble slabs flush with the plaza. Interesting facts about the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier and the Sentinels of the Third United States Infantry Regiment “Old Guard.”
Springs South African Police Service commander Brig Jeshop Shabangu – ‘weakest link in fight against crime
Notes: Tempo should be 3 counts from floor to knees, explode past knees driving hips to bar, 3 counts back to floor. Concentrate on keeping legs loaded NOT back. Maintain vertical shin.
Hello, I'm back today with this weeks card for a new challenge over at the CES Challenge Blog. This week Sue has chosen the theme "Humour/Funny". If I'm honest it got me stumped. Something I don't make many of, but remembered that I had some stamps from years ago (unused of course) that were humerous and I even remembered the colour box they were in.
of this view
